Part 4. Chapter 62 to 100.

“So Lee-yeon,” continued the voice from the phone. “I have already made this clear on
the first day we met.”
Lee-yeon was very confused now. “You have all my support,” said the voice. “I will, of
course, send you resources. I don’t care if you have made my brother a hospital
employee, a housekeeper or your toy. Just don’t forget what you need to do.”
“I’ll catch the real criminal and put him in your place.”
“Try your best to keep him inside Hwaido.”
Lee-yeon’s face hardened as she remembered his words. She murmured her
affirmative looking pale. Kwon Chae-woo glanced at the phone and then at Lee-yeon.
He let out a sigh of frustration.
“Why are you ordering my wife?” he said in annoyance. “If you are going to say
something as stupid, don’t call her ever again!”
Kwon Ki-seok smirked. His brother’s voice sounded so innocent, so unlike the
ferocious and reckless man he used to be before the accident. The youngest son of the
feared gangster family. His dear brother that he had raised. Kwon Chae-woo had
outright refused any care and resources from his parents. He would always grit his
teeth and draw a line between himself and everyone else.
But Kwon Chae-woo sounds like a tamed animal now.
“Director Jo.”
“Yes, sir,” bowed Jo Kyung-cheon. He looked as though there was immense pressure
on his shoulders, literally. That hadn’t changed since the time he first visited this
place in a school uniform.
A house composed of dozens of hanok.
The black tiles that resembled waves looked as peaceful as a flock of cranes. But the
deeper he went, the more suffocating it got. It felt as though he had entered the
serpent’s mouth.
The Kwon family. A name that was only whispered in fear.
The Kwon family was one of the three major real estate managers in Korea. An
organization with enormous economic power, and the centre of the Blue House that
dominated the shadows. It was said that Kwon Ki-seok’s grandfather had created his
empire by lending money to small companies in need to capital. The money he
invested had double and tripled to tens of billions of dollars.
After 80 years, the Kwon family had become so powerful that they were the
forerunners of almost every large corporation that were currently in the Republic of
Korea. They had established themselves as an unwavering and authoritative shadow of
the country.
The stories about Chairman Kwon giving up an entire site for the Central Intelligence
Agency and loaning them his hunting dogs as Blue Falcons were still whispered.
The court became the National Security Agency and transformed back into the
National Intelligence Service. The hounds formed a private organization under direct
control of the president and has been set up as a group responsible for cleaning up
the mess.
The president might be smart, but Chairman Kwon was smarter. He secured his place
as a major shareholder. He did all this without ever leaving his mansion.
The influence of the Kwon family, which had been managed unwaveringly for nearly a
century, was even stronger than before. Their business was at the centre of their
success. Their predominant business was lending loans. Chairman kwon enjoyed his
dirty work. He also nurtured the elites more than anyone else.
He thirsted to expand his influence and his power beyond this place to the outside
world. He also supported children from poor families who had the potential to do
something great. Kwon family, in this way, raised many children and provided top-tier
education for them to dominate every facet of society. It was how the kwon family
maintained their power.
Jo Kyung-cheon had been one of those children.
“Director. I apologize for what happened.”
“No, sir. It is I who must apologize. I didn’t know Hwang Jo-yoon would cause such
trouble.”
“I heard that he was your favourite student.”
“I once entertained the idea of training him because he showed potential. That is all.”
Jo Kyung-cheon had caught Hwang Jo-yoon in his undergraduate studies cultivated
illegal drugs. He had though he could train the young man enough to entrust him with
the drug cultivation in Hwaido. All his efforts had gone down the drain and just
because of Hwang Jo-yoon’s reckless behaviour. When he had found out Hwang Joyoon had gotten involved in a mess related to Director Kwon, he had cut him off from
his business.
“Is it going well?” asked Kwon Ki-seok.
After Chairman Kwon’s death, Kwon Ki-seok’s father had broken the family tradition
and revealed himself. His company swallowed the Hydrangea Pharmaceutical Co. Ltd.
which was in a difficult circumstance at the time.
“Yes. It’s all going very smooth.”
“No one must know about the rare plant.”
“Yes, sir. I will keep that in mind.” Jo Kyung-cheon bowed. A face flashed through his
mind. Kwon Ki-seok had made the researchers disappear one after another. It was to
keep things confidential. Sweat beaded Jo Kyung-cheon’s forehead.
“Hwaido is very important.”
There was no place on the island where the power of Kwon family did not reach. The
entire Hwaido was a useful incineration spot for the family’s mess.
“You have to win the Hwaidome project,” said Kwon Ki-seok.
Jo Kyun-cheon knew that it wasn’t a request, or a wish for his well-being. He knew he
had to win.

“Have you been treated like that all this time?” asked Kwon Chae-woo, caressing her
hand that he held. Lee-yeon’s face was very pale. “Why do you even bother with
them?”
Kwon Chae-woo didn’t understand why Lee-yeon lowered her head at that man’s
words and try to be extra polite to him. He wasn’t even her boss.
“I… just…. He has never come here. He has also never said anything bad to me. He
only calls about once every month. Don’t worry about it.”
Kwon Chae-woo let out sigh. “This is all because of me, isn’t it? Just because I don’t
remember anything.”
“What?’
“My family looks down on you because they know I don’t remember anything. I just…
feel like I have failed you. I am so sorry, Lee-yeon.”
She felt a prick of her conscience. She wasn’t in a place to accept his apology. Now
when she had brought this on herself by all the lies she had created.
“Did you already know my family was like that?” He asked.
“I… didn’t know in the beginning,” answered Lee-yeon slowly. She avoided his gaze.
“Did I… hide my family background when I approached you? I can tell from just his
voice that my brother lacks a lot as a human being.” He looked at her questioningly.
“Did I deceive you to get you to marry me?” he asked.
“No…,” said Lee-yeon. She wanted to reassure him but didn’t know how to. “We didn’t
know much about each other’s families when we got married. And I… I didn’t bring it
up…”
Kwon Chae-woo squeezed her hand comfortingly. Is face looked sad. “I feel like I owe
you a lot.”
“Why?” asked Lee-yeon.
“I feel that I am somehow responsible for all the hardships you are facing,” he said.
He lowered his forehead to the back of her hand. His heavy breath melted on her skin.
Kwon Chae-woo wasn’t wrong. Lee-yeon had gotten involved in many crazy incidences
after she had met him. She had lived her life in fear. But still, she felt her eyes water
as she heard him admit it.

“What can I do?” he asked, his eyes full of emotion. “What can I do that will fix
things?”
Lee-yeon closed her eyes and took a deep breath. Kwon Chae-woo was offering
something she never had in her life before.
“Just…” She was trying to slow down her rapidly beating heart. “Just be calm. Don’t
get angry and things won’t get hard. I just wish your syndrome would get better.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked frustrated. So Lee-yeon was so damn stubborn. He promised
himself that he would break down the wall she hid behind.

“It’s no use. You don’t qualify anyway.” Gyu-baek said, as he read through the
encyclopedia quickly. He and Kwon Chae-woo sat at a table in the sunlight,
exchanging psychological warfare. Kwon Chae-woo rested his chin on his hands, his
face expressionless.
“Only me, a young monkey, has a chance,” Gyu-baek continued.
“I’m sorry to inform you professor, but monkeys are different from people,” Kwon
Chae-woo retorted.
“They’re both animals. Their habits are similar,” Gyu-baek insisted. “Young monkeys
smell good.”
Kwon-Chae-woo laughed. The boy would not stop talking about monkeys. A baby
monkey would never survive in society.
“People might think I smell bad. I have you know, I wash up well, professor,” Kwon
Chae-woo needed to stop humouring the child. “In human society, young men are not
popular.”
He held up his hand to count off the reasons on his fingers. “You don’t have any
savings, you’re busy trying to stay alive, you haven’t any experiences in the world,
you’re not mature, you have no sense of responsibility…”
“But you also don’t have any money,” Gyu-baek interrupted. Kwon Chae-woo stopped
and stared at the child. “You don’t have a job. You’re unemployed. You lie around all
day. You boast about your experience. Your wife does all the work. It’s the worst when
a monkey is old and still doesn’t have anything.”
Kwon Chae-woo felt like his head was going to explode in anger from the insults he
was taking.
“You’ve been basically living like an insect.” Gyu-baek glanced up at him. “You have
the same characteristics as a beetle larva: eat, sleep, poo, repeat.”
Kwon Chae-woo stuttered and spit, unable to find any words. Gyu-baek just buried
himself back into his book, with a sly grin on his face.

The announcement for the second tournament was released. Lee-yeon quickly read
the email with excitement, but she became stern as she scrolled down.
Last year, due to five days of continuous rain, there were massive landslides that
poured down from the mountains. The muck, that flowed like waves in the ocean,
swallowed houses and cars. Casualties numbered in the hundreds. It was a terrifying
disaster.
Approximately thirty houses were swept away entirely, and electricity was cut off to
thousands of households. Even though Lee-yeon had been living a fair distance from
the disaster zone, she still needed to use a back-up generator to keep the medical
devices attached to Kwon Chae-woo running.
She was troubled with the information in the email. The second tournament was
being held in the very region the disaster had occurred. It involved rescuing trees. The
Forest Service would be opening up the closed region for the contestants to enter. The
goal of the competition was forest restoration. To plant as many trees as possible
within the twenty-four-hour time limit. Contestants were allowed to bring one
companion. Lee-yeon felt her stamina being drained already, just by reading about the
event.
“Lee-yeon, didn’t you say you’re going to visit a patient at five?” Kwon Chae-woo
walked into Lee-yeon’s office holding a ladle. Lee-yeon stared at the man in the apron
for a moment, then quickly jumped out of her chair with a shriek
“Is it time already?” Lee-yeon started panicking.
“What are you going to eat?”
“I’ll eat whatever when I come back, so go ahead and have your dinner. And don’t wait
up!”
Kwon Chae-woo stopped her with the ladle as she tried to run out the door. “Take me
with you.”
“What?” Lee-yeon didn’t have time for this.
“If you can’t share a meal with me at home, then take me with you and make me
work,” his eyes had taken on that serious quality again. “I’ll be your shovel and your
axe.”
The way he spoke of himself, as an object, disturbed her. She didn’t want him talking
like this again. Especially since the first time she met him he was burying a person
alive.
“I prefer that you stay at home. Clean, cook, meditate with flowers, whatever. Just
stay calm. That will make me feel relieved.”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. In his ears, Gyu-baek’s voice was taunting him. “You want
me to be like a flower?” he said, his voice turning sinister.
Lee-yeon flinched in spite of herself. He was starting to realize her intentions of
keeping him shut away in the house as much as possible.
“I was wondering if it’s more comfortable for you if I were the submissive kind of
husband.”
His eyes that didn’t reveal his feelings. Lee-yeon couldn’t tell what he was thinking.
The best thing was to just be honest with him.
“Yes. It is.” Kwon Chae-woo didn’t say anything. “I just want you to be safe.”
There was no reaction from him. But his expressionless face felt like a darkness
hovering over Lee-yeon. Their eyes glared at each other. Then Kwon Chae-woo did
something for the first time, more out of disgust than out of acceptance. He agreed.
“I will,” he whispered.
No matter how she phrased it, it was clear that Lee-yeon was just trying to keep him
locked up. She had certainly dropped the idea a while ago of him getting identification
so he could get a job. Even though his so-called brother was holding her hostage, Leeyeon had no intention of trying to get help from Kwon Chae-woo. The only thing she
wanted to do was eliminate his aggressiveness and turn him into a pretty flower. But
it was pointless, for he was born an animal. But, for now, he would play her game. He
smiled.
“Then for today, I’ll pack food for you,” Kwon Chae-woo said.
Lee-yeon nodded. She needed to believe that he was trying to do as she asked.

Lee-yeon kneeled in front of the destroyed tree. Its bark was completely peeling off as
it was feasted on by caterpillars. She finished spraying the pesticide and removed her
latex gloves. The guardian beside her shoved his hands in his jacket pockets and
studied her work.
“So, doctor. I’m curious about something…”
“We don’t cut down trees,” Lee-yeon interrupted. The guardian looked startled at Leeyeon’s sudden statement. “Many clients request it. They seem to think that if the
diseased tree roots grow into the tombs and wrap around the bodies of their
ancestors, their descendants will have back luck.”
She saw the guardian glance at the tomb that stood beside the tree. His eyes widened
at the thought that she read his mind.
“They want us to destroy trees that are hundreds of years old,” Lee-yeon continued.
“The world still doesn’t know the value of a tree.”
Lee-yeon closed her tool bag and fixed her straw hat. “If you cut down this tree, there
will be nothing around to protect the tomb. If your ancestors are that important, then
come by more often and take care of the trees.”

“Do you know your face changes the moment you look at a tree?” Kwon Chae-woo had
been watching Lee-yeon working from the edge of the grove. He took her bag from
her to lighten her load.
“I just feel comfortable around trees.” Lee-yeon smiled.
As the sun started to set in a glow of red, Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t take his eyes off of
his wife’s smile.
“Comfortable?” he asked,
“Yes. The poet Rilke wrote poems underneath a tree beside his lane and Schubert
relaxed underneath a lime tree. Even Gautama Buddha was born underneath the tree
of souci and gained wisdom underneath a linden tree.” She turned around to face
Kwon Chae-woo. “People have no issue living without love, but everything in the world
will be contaminated if there are no trees.”
“So, what did you do that was underneath a tree?”
“Well…” A memory entered Lee-yeon’s mind, but she stopped herself from saying it.
“What? Was it your first kiss?”
“No!”
“Then, what was it?”
“I often took refuge under a tree,” Lee-yeon answered, looking away. “And listened to
music there.”
Kwon Chae-woo realized that he wasn’t part of the memory she was thinking about. It
made him sad. “What kind of music?” he asked.
“String music.”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. A memory rushed into his head of the melody he heard at
the party. The sharp sound of a stringed instrument cut right through his nerves,
causing nausea and a headache. It had been an unusual reaction.
“The German spruce is used to make stringed instruments.” Kwon-Chae-woo tried to
clear his head as she continued on. “I find it astonishing that I treat hurt trees, yet
someone else will cut it to create an instrument. Is the death of a tree worth the sound
of music?”
As she was contemplated these philosophies, Kwon Chae-woo tripped over a broken
branch. Lee-yeon stopped, looking around. The surrounding trees were all marred
with gashes about fifty centimetres long that seemed to be made by a sharp knife. Her
face became concerned.
If not treated, the phloem would become damaged and nutrients would no longer be
transferred to the roots. If the bark peeled off anymore, the trees would eventually
starve to death.
Who in the world would do this? Lee-yeon thought. She went to the trees to take a
closer look. At least seven or eight trees had the same wounds that appeared to have
been made by a human. They almost appeared to be directional symbols that had been
carved into the trunks.
Lee-yeon followed the wounds of the trees, half-believing they would lead her to the
culprit. The directions changed quickly, like the paths of a maze, and she became
dizzy as she walked around in circles. Finally, her random steps ended at a banner
half-falling of a post. The corners of the faded warning statement were turning black,
having been exposed to the elements for a number of years.
It was a ‘No Trespassing’ sign. The forested area beyond it was thick with growth and
she couldn’t see too far in. Usually, these warnings meant there was a cliff or steep
drop-off just beyond.
Lee-yeon felt weak. She turned to Kwon Chae-woo, only to find that he was not with
her. The forest behind her was empty. She must have left him behind as she ran off
following the injured trees. She began to feel a sense of panic.
This was both their first time in the forests of this mountain. The sun was getting
lower and if it got dark, neither of them would be able to find their way out. Lee-yeon
trembled. She needed to retrace her footsteps quickly and find him.
As she began heading back the way she had come, six people carrying garbage bags
appeared from amongst the trees. They appeared to be gathering items from the
forest floor. Lee-yeon assumed it was garbage that had been left by uncaring hikers,
and that filled her with joy.
The people nodded as they passed by her, heading towards the off-limits area. “You
shouldn’t go in there,” she told them.
The people stopped, looking back at her, confused. “It’s a dead end in there. It could
be dangerous,” she explained.
One of the men spoke up and asked, “Are you a city employee?” He looked around the
area. “Are you alone?” He spoke with the regional dialect, so he must have been from
the area.
“No. My husband is following me…”
The man rushed over, getting right into her face. “I thought we had a deal, but you
want something more?” he snarled.
“What are you talking about?” She suddenly felt as if she were in danger. She turned
to leave, but the men circled her, closing her in.
“Which are you? Are you from the city or police?”
Lee-yeon waved her hands in denial “I’m a tree doctor!”
The men erupted with sinister laughter. They certainly didn’t believe her. Then it
occurred to her. This mountain was known for the placement of tombs, not for hiking.
So, what were they doing here? A news bulletin came back to her. People had been
illegally harvesting trumpet mushroom, pine nuts, herbs, and ginseng from the
wildlands. These were protected areas.
Lee-yeon tried to appear calm, as she surreptitiously put her hand into her pocket to
find the familiar rectangle of her phone.
“I meet lots of annoying people like you. They always lie to me.” The man’s expression
was becoming more frightening. “But do you know what happened after?” he asked.

“Kwon Chae-woo!” Kwon Chae-woo’s head turned towards the voice in the air. It was
faint, almost as if it was a trick of the wind. He frowned, trying to figure out the
direction it was coming from. He started running, unsure if he was going the right
way. He cursed the fact that there weren’t any proper trails on this mountain.
The ground was getting hard to see, as the dusk closed in. A huge boulder covered in
moss suddenly appeared from the shadows. Kwon Chae-woo jumped over it, at the last
minute, and continued running through the bush.
“Lee-yeon!” he called back to the forest. He was cursing himself for getting distracted.
He had been focusing on the broken branch he had found, envisioning how he would
carve it and make it a gift for Lee-yeon. When he finally looked up, he realized that he
was alone in the middle of the forest. After running through the brush for some time,
he heard the movements of a group of people ahead of him.
Through the branches of the trees, he could see a group of men carrying the limp
body of a woman. “You fucking bastards,” he swore to himself. It was clear the woman
was Lee-yeon. She appeared to be unconscious, as if she had been hit by a blunt
object. He hoped it was nothing worse.
He followed them as they carried her past a ‘No Trespassing’ sign and disappeared
into some thick brush. Lying, discarded on the ground in front of where the group
disappeared, was Lee-yeon’s medical bag. He opened it and shoved anything that
looked like it could be used as a weapon into his pockets.
He decided that he was going to take his time eliminating these men. He was going to
cut off all their fingers for touching Lee-yeon. Then he had the intention of shoving
those fingers down their throats as well. He started imagining all of the merciless and
brutal things he would do to these men, when Lee-yeon’s voice echoed though his
head. ‘Be calm,’ it said. ‘Don’t get angry and things won’t get hard. I just wish your
syndrome would get better.’
Surprising, the rage within him began to slowly quell. He laughed. It was a twisted
sound.!

Kwon Chae-woo could never be a saint. He knew his mentality was developed to be
mean and harsh. The cruel thoughts and violence were as natural as using utensils. It
shamed him to think that his wife was so weak and fearful.
He couldn’t be with her simply on an emotional basis. For their relationship to
flourish, it was important that their worlds become closer, not just one side liking the
other. It needed something more than feelings.
However, it felt like the huge gap could never be filled between So Lee-yeon, who
wanted her husband to be restrained and docile, and Kwon Chae-woo, who would slay
a boar with no hesitation. The worlds they walked in were polar opposites. After today,
I’ll try to calm my natural tendencies, he thought as he chased after the men with eyes
full of vengeance. But you will also have to come towards me and harden your
disposition.
After running by the ‘No Trespassing’ sign and struggling through the thick bush, he
burst into a clearing where several grimy storage containers had been dumped. Kwon
Chae-woo quickly lowered himself behind an outcropping of boulders and surveyed
the area. Two glass greenhouses had been erected amongst the storage containers
and a strange smell emanated from them.
“Who are you?” A thick club pressed down against his back. Kwon Chae-woo lifted his
hands in surrender. Judging by the dialect of the man standing behind him, he knew
where the man was from.
Standing slowly, Kwon suddenly swung around, grabbing the club and pulling the man
forward. As the man stumbled, he swung an arm around the man neck and began
squeezing his throat in a choke hold. The man struggled in his arm, after recovering
from the shock of being overpowered. Kwon continued to apply pressure to the man’s
throat, whose face was turning from blue to a deep purple.
“Why are you bad people always so slow?” Kwon Chae-woo said to the man in his
arms. ”Never mind. I need to ask you a favour.” The man’s eyes were starting to falter
and Kwon released him just before he passed out. The man gasped and sputtered for
breath.
Kwon Chae-woo looked at the man struggling to breathe. He wet his lips. “Don’t be
loud and hit me once,” Kwon said, smiling.

A harsh chemical smell overcame her senses. As Lee-yeon regained consciousness,
she realized she was tied to a chair. The spot on her head, where she had been hit,
throbbed with a dull pain. The rough rope pressed down on her tender skin, squeezing
her to the point of immobility.
“Oh, you’re awake!” A man approached her, removing his white mask. She could see
other masked men beyond the person who addressed her. They were busy at tables,
processing flowers that were as red as blood. Lee-yeon knew instantly what they were:
poppies.
When did the peaceful life on this island become so unpredictable? Lee-yeon
admonished herself at the fact that she kept somehow getting involved in dangerous
situations.
Is Kwon Chae-woo all right? she thought. The mountains become extremely more
dangerous after dark. If he was lost, no one would be able to find him until the sun
came up. Her concern was more for him, then for herself, right now.
“Hey, I’m talking to you. What are you looking at?” Lee-yeon’s head was wrenched
back by her hair. “Are you not scared?”
Lee-yeon closed her eyes to shut out the disconcerting feature of her captor. He may
be as aggressive as Kwon Chae-woo, but he certainly wasn’t anything like him in any
other way.
“People like you die here,” the man threatened her. “Others tried to sneak in.”
She was scared of her own situation, yet her mind kept drifting back to Kwon Chaewoo being left alone in the woods. He didn’t even have a cell phone. The man took
Lee-yeon’ silence to mean she was hiding something. He turned her head left and
right, looking into her ears.
“Are you wired?” he asked. “No ear mics. Let’s check your clothes.”
Lee-yeon glared at the man, as he tapped on her to see if there were any hidden mics.
He couldn’t look inside the ropes, but he felt up all of the uncovered areas. He spent a
little too much time feeling around the more intimate areas, and it disgusted her. She
refused to show any reaction and held her breath as she was violated. The man
stopped at the sound of a loud thump at the door.
The entire room silenced, and all the workers looked towards the entrance as the door
opened. There was a short, young man standing in the portal, holding a dagger to his
hostage. Lee-yeon’s determination to stay calm, gave way. The hostage the man held
at knife point was Kwon Chae-woo.
Lee-yeon wasn’t sure how badly he was hurt, but there was blood streaming from his
nose and mouth and his cheeks were swollen. Kwon Chae-woo stumbled, as his captor
shoved him inside, and it looked like he was having hard time keeping balance.
Waves of different emotions were ignited within her. Anger, relief, worry. Her mind
was a chaos of reactions.
“Lee-yeon.” Kwon Chae-woo croaked her name as he noticed her. He had scanned the
entire room and taken every detail in.

Kwon Chae-woo dropped his head, his face a myriad of different colours from the
beating. The young man never noticed any change, but Kwon Chae-woo’s movements
seemed to get smoother, as if he had regained control of his body.
“There certainly are some random things on this tiny ass island,” Kwon Chae-woo
rasped defiantly. “I can’t even go to a picnic with Lee-yeon anymore, without feeling
uneasy.”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned and turned to the man holding the knife on him. “Don’t you
think it’s too dangerous for anyone to have children here?”
The young man, holding Kwon Chae-woo’s arm, looked shock as he didn’t know what
to make of his hostage’s strange behavior. In fact, the young man was more scared of
Kwon Chae-woo. The young man was used to craziness. The drugs they produced
destroyed any sense of rationality. People who were affected reverted back to a
primordial nature whether they wanted to or not. He had seen it all, but nothing like
what this man did.
Kwon Chae-woo had been asked to be beaten when the young man had snuck up on
him spying. And the strangest thing was that Kwon appeared to have a clear mind.
The young man threw some punches, at Kwon’s request, but Kwon didn’t feel it was
enough so began hitting himself. It was the most psychotic action the young man had
ever witnessed.
After Kwon had beaten himself black and blue, he turned to the young man and asked,
“Do I look pathetic? My wife takes good care of the sick and pathetic.”
The young man was sure that Kwon was on some form of drugs he had never seen. He
had heard that bath salts caused this sort of behaviour. Maybe, Kwon had come here
to get more drugs? The young man went through all of the possibilities in his mind.
Then Kwon took it one step further, picking up a rock. As if the initial strikes weren’t
enough, Kwon began slamming the rock into his nose and lips without hesitation. The
young man actually tried to stop Kwon from causing any further abuse to himself. He
was frightened, as he watched Kwon bleed without any sense of regret or pain. Kwon
finished with the beating, smeared dirt all over his clothes, messed up his hair and
then handed a knife to the young man
“Drag me in as a prisoner.” Kwon ordered.
“You don’t have to…” the young man began, really wanting nothing to do with Kwon
anymore.
“You don’t know how to deal with a bastard who was spying on you, do you?” Kwon
asked. The young man didn’t know what to do. He had thought about yelling to the
others. They had killed plenty of people, but for some reason the young man didn’t
think they could kill Kwon.
Now that they had returned to the base, the young man was just hoping he would
make it through the next few minutes. He watched as Kwon Chae-woo went to the
other prisoner tied to a chair and knelt by her side.
“Are you hurt at all?” Kwon asked Lee-yeon. “I’m sorry, for letting you go.”
Lee-yeon felt sad that she had got them into this position. Kwon’s face looked even
worse, closer up. Her heart raced as she watched the group of drug dealers slowly
encircle them with steel pipes in hand. Yet, Kwon Chae-woo seemed to not even see
them, and rested his chin on her thigh.
“Lee-yeon, are you hungry?” Kwon asked. “Should we set up our picnic here?”
Lee-yeon stared at him as if he had gone insane. Sure, this looked like a peaceful
cabin in the woods, if it wasn’t for the drugs and the men who appeared intent on
killing them.
“Kwon Chae-woo, we’re in trouble,” she said harshly, trying to break him out of
whatever fantasy he appeared stuck in.
Kwon Chae-woo nodded his head slightly. Kwon Chae-woo turned and spat blood at
the men surrounding them. “Are you growing drugs?” he asked.
“Who is this crazy bastard?” one of the drug dealers asked.
Kwon Chae-woo turned back to Lee-yeon and said, “Lee-yeon, let’s move tomorrow.”
“What?” Lee-yeon was beginning to think that Kwon Chae-woo had completely lost it.
“You work in the mountain. Do you think I’m going to let you go back to work after
this has happened? You won’t even let me come with you to protect you. So, if you
want to keep meeting murderers…”
Kwon Ki-seok’s plea came into Lee-Yeon’s mind. He said to make sure Kwon Chae-woo
never left Hwaido. “I like Hwaido,” she said.
“Even if it’s this messed up?” Kwon Chae-woo said, indicating the men who had
surrounded them and were watching the conversation as if it was a daily soap opera.
Lee-yeon didn’t have anything to say. How did it come to this? she thought. Beautiful
Hwaido. She loved the island since the first time she set foot on it, looking for a place
to live. She could never leave this natural wonder, surrounded by forests and sea.
“You guys are making me laugh. You still think you can go home?” One of the drug
dealers mocked their interaction, then slammed the sledgehammer he was holding on
to Kwon Chae-woo’s foot. Kwon Chae-woo howled, showing pain for the first time.
Lee-yeon screamed. “We’ll pretend we haven’t seen anything!” she shouted to the
men.
Kwon Chae-woo was biting his lip, drawing blood in an attempt to not make any
sound. He buried his face into Lee-yeon’s thigh and moaned.
“We’re just ordinary people!” Lee-yeon tried to plead to the drug dealers.
“Think about it,” the man with the sledgehammer said, “Is it more beneficial to us if
we let you live or if we kill you?” Lee-yeon just stared at the men in fear.
“Dice up the man so we can bag him and take him to the boat for dumping.”
All the thugs advanced at once. They pulled Kwon Chae-woo away from Lee-yeon and
started stomping on him and striking him with the steel pipes. Kwon-Chae-woo didn’t
resist and just curled up in a fetus position to try and protect the vulnerable parts of
his anatomy.
“Kwon Chae-woo!” Lee-yeon screamed as she strained against her bonds. “Stop!
Please, stop!”
Kwon Chae-woo body was convulsing on the floor. He had a split on his brow that was
pouring blood, and bruises were purpling on every inch of his exposed skin. Lee-yeon
struggled harder, but there was nothing she could do.
“What are you doing? Get up Kwon Chae-woo! Are you just going to let them beat
you?” Lee-yeon cried, her voice trembling.
One of the drug dealers lifted a steel pipe, aiming for it to come crashing down on
Kwon’s head. Lee-yeon tried to stand, while still attached to the chair, and ended up
falling over.
“Please not the head! Don’t hit his head! If you need to hit him, hit anywhere else, just
not the head!” Lee-yeon cried. The man stopped; the steel pipe held over his head.
“Please! His head is weak! If he gets hit in the head, it can be really bad! Please don’t
do this!” Lee-yeon tried to crawl across the floor to her husband, dragging the chair
she was attached to with her. The steel pipe started it’s swing downwards. “Kwon
Chae-woo, move!”
Kwon Chae-woo suddenly rolled to the side. The steel pipe struck the empty floor. But
the rest of the men did not stop pummeling him.
“Kwon Chae-woo, what are you doing!?” Lee-yeon shouted. “Why are you letting beat
them beat you!? You’re not that person! Hit them, hit them! You’re capable of fighting
back!”
“I shouldn’t be doing that.” He moaned between strikes. “You don’t want me to
become violent.”
Lee-yeon could not believe what she was hearing. This situation was entirely different.
“Are you really that stupid? They’re killing you! This is not the time to act all noble!
fucking kill them,” she shrieked.
Kwon Chae-woo’s lips curved up in a smile of joy. She had finally come up to his level.
His eyed cleared and he moaned in pleasure. Taking out a dagger he had hidden in his
coat, he began slicing at the thugs, cutting tendons in their ankles and stabbing into
the muscles of their calves.
Kwon Chae-woo actions were fluid, and the men began falling like freshly harvested
sugar cane. Lee-yeon flinched and closed her eyes. She could hear the sickening
sounds as Kwon Chae-woo started smashing their skulls in by slamming their heads
against the table.
When the sounds of suffering died down, Lee-yeon slowly opened her eyes. It was if
the room had been hosed down with blood. It pooled on the floor, ran down the walls,
and dripped from the ceiling. Lee-yeon fought the urge to vomit and shook her head,
trying to remove the sight before her. Yet, if this situation ever occurred again, she
would say the same thing to Kwon.
One dealer still stood in this drug farm on the beautiful island of Hwaido. They needed
to get past him so they could reveal to the authorities this location. Maybe there were
more drug dens on the other mountains. It was important that they found them all.
“What are you?” It was the man with the sledgehammer who still stood, his eyes wide
in fear at the sight of the bloody mess that was Kwon. Kwon Chae-woo wiped the
blade of his knife clean on his clothes and ignored the man’s question.
The drug dealer attempted one last attack in desperation. Kwon Chae-woo dodged the
heavily swinging hammer and got within the man’s guard. Grasping the man’s arms,
he flipped him to the ground. The man lay on the ground, moaning in pain. He picked
up the hammer and swung it down on the man’s feet, just like what had been done to
him. Then he raised the hammer again and smashed it down on the man’s hands, in
retribution for touching Lee-yeon. This entire time, his face showed no emotion.
When the massacre had been completed, Kwon Chae-woo dug through the pockets of
the bodies. He collected a number of cell phones. Then he made his way to Lee-yeon.
“Are you all right?” he asked, as he sat her up and cut the ropes that held her.
“Yes.” Lee-yeon tried to control her fear, not only from the drug dealers that had
tortured her, but from the man he had become just now. Kwon Chae-woo saw the
terror in her eyes and he became saddened at what he put her through.
“No one’s dead,” Kwon Chae-woo assured her. “Lee-yeon, are you all right?” Kwon
Chae-woo seemed to be the one who was injured the most. Cuts and bruises covered
his body.
“Kwon Chae-woo,” Lee-yeon whispered weakly, “Offense would’ve been the best
defense.”
Her heart was heavy with guilt. She had forgotten that Kwon Chae-woo was the kind
of man who would take Lee-yeon’s words as if they were the words of God. She
blamed herself, thinking that it was her fault that he got hurt simply because she tried
to change him into someone he wasn’t. Kwon Chae-woo did not resist even though he
was being beaten up and tortured. The terrible pain he endured had left a deep mark
on her heart.
“I’m okay, Kwon Chae-woo.” Lee-yeon took a deep breath and glanced up at him.
“There will be times when you’ll want to smash things, and there will be times when
you’ll just want to spend a quiet night with someone else. It’s totally normal to feel
that way. You will feel that way, not because you’re mentally sick, but because that’s
what your instinct says. I tried to change you to someone I thought you should be, but
the truth is everyone is different.”
Lee-yeon nodded her head as if trying to convince herself. “From now on, don’t try to
change yourself for me. These days, being a good fighter can be a plus. With your
level of skill, you can help Gyu-baek catch insects with wings, or you can protect your
family from bad people like these men we met today. Thank you for saving me.”
Lee-yeon avoided Kwon Chae-woo’s gaze the whole time she spoke. Kwon Chae-woo
furrowed his eyebrows and put on a sweet smile. Ignoring the throbbing pain, all he
could feel was a tingle in his heart. “Let’s go home now. Let’s get out of here. But,
before that, can you take a picture of this place?”
Lee-yeon turned on the camera on her phone and started collecting photos for
evidence. Kwon Chae-woo rummaged through the old phones he took from the men’s
pockets. They all seemed to be burner phones. As he scanned the message boxes with
cold eyes, the corners of his lips twitched upward.
TiririSuddenly, one of the phones rang through the cold night air. Lee-yeon, who was
nearby, held her breath when she saw the name on the small screen.
「Jo Kyung-cheon」
Lee-yeon stretched out her arm to pick up the phone when a hand stopped her. She
shrieked, almost having a heart attack, from Kwon Chae-woo sneaking up behind her.
For some reason, he had a thin black cloth over his head.
“What, what are you doing?” she asked.
“Lee-yeon, do you want to go boating with me?”
“What?” He was scaring her again.
“We haven’t been able to finish our date, so why don’t we go boating?” Lee-yeon could
hear Kwon Chae-woo humming joyfully under the cloth.

Hwaido is an island. When you travel a few kilometers from the mountains to the
wharf, you’re able see the fishing boats floating in a line. Lee-yeon clasped her palms
as she watched the quickly changing scenery outside the car window. The old van
rattled badly every time it hit a bump in the road.
“Kwon Chae-woo, are you out of your mind?” Lee-yeon asked nervously. “Why are you
doing this to me? You’re scaring the life out of me.”
Kwon Chae-woo was still wearing the black cloth on his head and had bound his two
hands with rope. Anyone who saw him would mistake him for a hostage.
“You told me to smash everything if I wanted to. I want to be useful.” He had a
murderous look in his eyes. “I’ll become your proud husband who deserves to be
awarded.”
Whatever you’re trying to say, if you’re dressed up like that, nothing will sound
convincing at all, Lee-yeon thought. If she were to wrap a rope around his neck, he
would have looked like someone who was about to be executed. The thin cloth stuck to
his mouth every time he breathed.
Lee-yeon couldn’t make up her mind whether she should call Kwon Chae-woo’s
brother for help or call the police first.
“By the way, Lee-yeon. Was flower arranging the only thing I did before I got into the
accident?”
“Why are you suddenly asking me that?”
“Because I feel like I’m more used to using a knife than creating art with flowers. I
know where and how I need to stab people to kill them instantly. My brain can tell me
hundreds of ways to torture people, ways that will give them the greatest pain.” Kwon
Chae-woo said all of this without the slightest hint of emotion in his voice.
Lee-yeon clasped her hands tightly and swallowed. I take back everything I said. You
should never be allowed to leave the house. She pretended as if she wasn’t surprised
at his words. She spoke in what she hoped was a calm and convincing voice. “Your
hobby…was boxing.

“Is that so?” Kwon Chae-woo leaned his head back against the headrest.
Lee-yeon turned back to looking out the window. Her heart was pounding fast. The
leash of control she had on Kwon was quickly slipping away always and it made her
anxious. She could see her worried face in the reflection of the window. After another
ten minutes, the van slowed to a stop.
“Lee-yeon, stay in the car,” Kwon Chae-woo instructed.
“What?”
“It’s dangerous.”
“But…!”
“I brought a bento box, you can eat that while you wait.” Kwon chae-woo got out of
the car without saying anything further.
He opened the back and let out two of the men from the gang that they had brought
with them. He instructed them to drag him out on to the wharf. The two men, who
were weak and shaking from the numerous wounds they had obtained from the fight
earlier, looked at each other, unsure of what to make of this crazy man standing
before them.
“Do you guys think this is a joke?” Kwon Chae-woo asked. “You guys made a mistake
in the very beginning. You should’ve shot me as soon as you saw me. Didn’t the middle
manager teach you that?”
The two men stood in silence, confused and frightened.
“Buck up and stop shaking,” Kwon Chae-woo scolded. “I’m the one who’s on my way
to a quick death right now, but if anyone saw us, they would think you guys are the
hostages.”
One of the young men clenched his teeth and looked at Kwon Chae-woo, trying to
make out his face under the black cloth. “Are you the manager?” he asked. “Are you
here to check on how we’re doing?”
Kwon Chae-woo found it funny that the young man could ask him such a question. He
broke into a smile that was hidden beneath his veil.

The ship was moving away from the land. When the sound of the old motor faded, Leeyeon got out of the van and walked to the shore. The dark sea swallowed Kwon Chaewoo without a trace. Only the lights of the fishing boat shone like a small lighthouse
on the water. She paced around the dark dock in the chilly sea breeze.
‘They cultivate the poppies in the mountains and process them on the sea.’ Kwon
chae-woo had said. He had discovered that their base was located on a ship by
interrogating the gang members. Kwon Chae-woo had chosen one man to set an
example to the others, by breaking all ten of his fingers in front of the rest. This
quickly loosened the other men’s tongues. At least he had done this after he had sent
Lee-yeon out of the container.
During the interrogations, Lee-yeon went into the greenhouse to collect more photo
evidence. She didn’t know whether if her hands were shaking because of the mass
amount of red poppies staring back, or because of the desperate screams from the
shipping container echoing through the hillside
Now Kwon Chae-woo had disappeared on a boat.
It’s Kwon Chae-woo. It may be pointless to worry like this, she thought. But he went
out to sea. He’s never been to sea. What if they throw him in? What if he can’t swim?
Is where he’s going considered outside of Hwaido?

Is he outside of Hwaido? Is he? As soon as the thought came across her mind, a chill
ran down her spine. Her face turned pale, stark white against the backdrop of the
dark sea. She pressed her hand to her chest and tried to remain standing, as her legs
shook.
The sudden glare of a flashlight blinded Lee-yeon. The light poured over her like
molten iron. Lee-yeon covered her eyes. The light shifted downwards to the ground in
front of her. As her eyes adjusted back to the darkness she had been standing in, she
could make out the figure who stood before her. It was a cop wearing a fluorescent
vest.
“Who are you?” the officer asked. “Can you show me some ID?”
“Why?” Lee-yeon asked.
“We have been having an issue with attempted stowaways,” the cop answered as he
moved towards her.
Lee-yeon did not have good experiences with policemen and decided at that moment
to run instead of asking for help.
How can I trust the police in Hwaido? Lee-yeon thought as she fled. She had begun to
suspect everyone of having deceitful motives.
Recalling what the gang members had said about city hall employees and police
officers, Lee-yeon had reached the conclusion that city officials have been feeding
money to run the drug trade and law enforcement has been protecting them.
Therefore, there was no one she could fully trust.
The policeman blew a whistle and ran after her. Lee-yeon felt like her legs were going
to give out, but she couldn’t stop running. She made it back to the van that had been
parked up the road, hurriedly locked the door, and started the engine.
The cop caught up with her and banged on the window as she began to pull away.
Lee-yeon turned the steering wheel, swerving and causing the officer to tumble into
the ditch beside the laneway. Lee-yeon stepped on the gas, leaving the officer behind.
She was gasping for breath, as she drove away.
The phone she had thrown on to the passenger seat started to ring. Glancing in the
rearview mirror to make sure she wasn’t being followed, she reached over and hit the
answer button.

“Hello?”
“So Lee-yeon?” Lee-yeon hit the brake suddenly, causing her to bite her tongue. She
cursed under her breath. It was Kwon Ki-seok.
“Hello? What is the reason for your call?”
“Where is Chae-woo?” A large drop of sweat dripped off Lee-yeon’s forehead. He
knows, she thought. He already knows everything.
Lee-yeon frowned at the inexplicable sense of defeat. It felt like shackles had closed
on her lungs and started squeezing.
“Bring him,” the voice on the phone ordered. “If you break the contract like this, I
won’t show you any mercy. I have been letting you do whatever you want, and you
know that. Don’t make me angry. You know the consequences.”
Lee-yeon quickly turned the steering wheel and headed back to the dock, her panic
growing.

A terrible smell of drugs, mixed with fish, leaked out from inside the cabin.
“So, who is it this time?” On the deck, a man with a cut across his cheek asked the
youngest man before him. He nudged the prisoner with a dirty boot. “He’s pretty
calm. Is he from the district office?”
Anyone brought to the ship usually cried and begged for mercy. But today’s guest is
no fun at all, the scarred man thought
“I don’t know,” the younger drug dealer said.
“Well, it doesn’t matter. Whoever he is, he’s going to die with a hole in his head.” The
scarred man, looked to the younger dealer. “Bring it,” he instructed him.
The scarred man raised his right hand, the ship’s lights suddenly turned off. The other
fishing boats that surrounded them also turned off their lights. A heavy silence fell in
the middle of the sea, as if to cover the sin that was about to be committed.
“What are you doing?” the scarred man asked as the dealer refused to move. “I said
bring it. Don’t make me repeat myself.” He slapped the young man, who appeared to
be in a daze. “What is wrong with you today?”
“Be careful,” the young man said.
“What are you talking about?”
“It’s a trap,” the young man whispered in the darkness.
Kwon Chae-woo, who had taken off the cloth from his head while the two dealers
argued, was now standing behind the scarred man. He quickly stabbed the man three
times, then threw him into the sea with a huge splash.
As if they’d just seen a ghost, everyone on the deck froze. There was a momentary
silence.
“Catch him!” someone shouted.
Ten men rushed out of the cabin, and the massacre began. Amidst the stabbing
knives, that seemed to come from every direction, Kwon Chae-woo’s hands moved
rapidly up and down, left and right. He blocked the blades rushing towards him,
knocking them out of the air as if they were toys.
His heart pounded fast, pumping hot blood throughout his body. Impossibly unable to
make a single counterattack, the men on the deck fell into the cold sea one by one. In
a matter of minutes, Kwon Chae-woo’s hands and face were covered with blood. It was
something more than the madness that gleamed in his eyes.
With a loud explosion, a bullet clipped Kwon Chae-woo’s thigh and lodged in the deck.
The young dealer was pointing the gun at Kwon Chae-woo with shaking hands.
“Don’t move! Or else I’ll shoot, you bastard!” he cried with a nervous voice.
Kwon Chae-woo turned. As soon as the dealer saw Kwon Chae-woo’s bloodthirsty
eyes, the color disappeared from the young man’s face. Kwon Chae-woo approached
him slowly and put his forehead against the barrel of the gun.
“Do it,” Kwon Chae-woo said, his voice unwavering. “You can’t be any older than
twenty?”
The young man did not know how to respond, and just stood shaking in fear. Kwon
Chae-woo grabbed the young man’s hand and repositioned the gun in it.
“Hold it like this,” Kwon Chae-woo said. “And pull the trigger.”
The young man hesitated, frozen in fear, so Kwon Chae-woo punched a fist into his
throat. The young man fell to the floor, gasping for breath and his face turning blue.
Kwon Chae-woo picked up the gun and entered the cabin. It was a workroom.
The first thing that he noticed were the skinny old men sitting at a table calmly,
oblivious to the chaos outside. Their backs were curved over the tabletop, their hands
moving non-stop blending and packaging the drugs. Various flasks, purification
equipment, and plastic wrappers were scattered all over the floor. Kwon Chae-woo
was speechless at the sight of not only the elderly but also children being forced to
pack drugs.
A series of bullets fired into the cabin from somewhere outside. The windows
shattered, and Kwon Chae-woo lowered his body to the floor, leaning his back against
the wall. One of the packagers was hit and slumped dead in his chair. The rest of the
slaves continued to process the drugs, regardless of the bullets flying around them.
Kwon Chae-woo checked the number of bullets left in the gun he had taken from the
young man outside. Carefully raising his head to one of the broken windows, he
scanned outside. In the moonlight, he could make out the shadows of snipers with
guns standing on the surrounding fishing boats.
Raising his arm and taking aim, he took out each gun man one by one. As they fell, the
remaining shooters started firing wildly, unsure of where Kwon Chae-woo was. Bullets
ricocheted off the deck. The barrage slowly diminished as each gunman fell.
Last one, Kwon Chae-woo thought as he pulled the trigger. There was a click, but no
discharge. Fuck! He crouched back down into the cabin, desperately looking for
another gun. A loud explosion, as if from a collision, echoed from outside. The
shooting stopped. Kwon Chae-woo crawled to the doorway to see the cause of the
noise.
The last fishing boat with a sniper, that Kwon Chae-woo failed to take out, had been
rammed by another old, rattling boat. The sniper had fallen into the sea and was
flailing in the water.
A string of lights shone from this new boat. The bright light blinded Kwon Chae-woo,
and he needed to shield his eyes to see the identity of this newcomer. He blinked a
couple of times at the unexpected face.
“Lee-yeon?”
His wife, who was the most innocent of women, was holding the wheel of the boat that
caused the accident. She backed off from the boat she struck and turned the wheel,
driving to where Kwon Chae-woo stood. As she pulled alongside the ship, she held up
her arms to him while trying to keep her balance on the rocking boat. Kwon Chae-woo
reached down and quickly lifted her on to the deck. He didn’t let go and embraced her
tightly, taking in her warmth. The ice that had been running through his veins started
melting and he could feel the blood pumping through his body again.
“Why did you come here?” Kwon Chae-woo asked, as he buried his face in the crook of
her neck. “I told you it was dangerous.”
Lee-yeon’s heart pounded so loudly, she could barely hear him. The man was covered
in blood again, she didn’t care. She was just concerned about the half-dead look in his
eyes, and his battered body.
“Lee-yeon, I don’t feel good,” Kwon Chae-woo croaked. “I want to go home.”
“That’s why I came here,” Lee-yeon whispered. “To pick you up. To take you home.
Let’s go home now.”
His expression quickly changed. The killer’s face disappeared. His eyes, that had been
drifting slowly to the abyss, now had a hint of life to them again. Lee-yeon observed
him change, chills running down her spine. How he could be two such different people
in one body disturbed her to no end.

“Did you call the police?”
“No,” Lee-yeon said sadly. As they were approaching the dock, with Lee-yeon at the
wheel of the drug boat, her hands began to tremble. They could see the lights of police
cruisers on the shore and a coast guard boat was making its way through the waters
towards them. “They’re here to arrest me,” she said.
“Did I hear that wrong?” Kwon Chae-woo asked. If they were going to arrest anyone, it
would be him.
“No, you heard right. I stole a boat.”
Kwon Chae-woo was speechless for the first time. It was hard to take his eyes off of
her. He felt an unexplainable wave of pride in Lee-yeon right now.
He needed that feeling of happiness. It had been a horribly, messy day. A day where
he had allowed his inner demons to come out. He was afraid of that demon, who
slaughtered people like a machine. There was no guilt, as body after body fell in front
of him. All he could calculate was how to kill more effectively and quickly. Something
came to him, and his eyes became dark once more.
“Lee-yeon, what does my face look like? Am I still me?” He was barely able to speak,
as he grunted out the words in fear. Lee-yeon just frowned at him, having no clue
what he meant.
“Do I still look human?” Kwon Chae-woo asked. “Am I still human?”
“Kwon Chae-woo, what are you…“ Lee-yeon stared into his eyes and stopped talking,
sharing the guilt he was feeling. She picked up a towel and started wiping the blood
from his face. He really was a mess, but she wasn’t going to tell him that. In the
flashing lights of the police cars, she smiled at Kwon-Chae-woo.
“You are still human,” she told him.
“But what if you’re not human?” he asked
“I think you forgot; you were in a vegetative state. You couldn’t move. And I was the
doctor that fixed you.” She smiled as he trembled in her arms.

The police overwhelmed them the moment they got off the boat. The first one they
tried to arrest was Lee-yeon. They had been called by a local officer who said the
woman refused to identify herself and he suspected her of being a smuggler when she
stole a boat.
But they couldn’t get anywhere near her to make the arrest. The man she was with,
held her in his embrace and refused to let her go.
“Do you also want to get arrested as well, for obstruction of justice? Let her go!” the
police demanded.
“Fine, bring me in as well,” Kwon Chae-woo shouted back. “Are you going to use those
handcuffs? Put one cuff on this woman and the other on me.”
The cops didn’t know what to do. This man seemed crazy. But, before they could
rectify the situation, their attention was directed somewhere else.
“Lieutenant!” someone shouted.
The boat the two individuals came in on was covered in blood and riddled with bullet
holes. It looked like something out of a horror movie. Police started leading the old
men and children, who had survived the massacre, from the boathouse where they
were still cowering. All of the officers turned their attentions away from Lee-yeon and
began concentrating on the crime scene on the boat.
Jang Beom-hee, who was disguised as one of the officers, moaned while staring at the
Kwon family’s boat.
“Young master, what did you do,” he whispered into the night.
Something was wrong. Lee-yeon couldn’t stop running the past two weeks through
her mind. Stealing a boat, ramming a ship, being lifted into Kwon Chae-woo’s
embrace, the sight of the carnage he left behind. All of it still haunted her. It felt like
someone, who was scared of water, had their feet in the sea. The feeling of the waves
coming in made that person flinch every time the crest crashed on the shore.
“Choo-ja, I need you to check something,” Lee-yeon said.
“What is it?” Choo-ja asked, lifting her head and looking at Lee-yeon with her
magnifiers on.
“Normal men. Do you know any normal men? Please, introduce me to one.”
Choo-ja blinked. “Introduce you? Did I hear that right?”
Lee-yeon rubbed her face like she was tired. “You said that So’s son was interested in
having a date before?”
“Director So, are you serious?” Choo-ja placed her hand on Lee-yeon’s forehead but
couldn’t sense a fever.
“Choo-ja, have you heard of misattribution of arousal?” Lee-yeon asked. “It was theory
that said when you meet someone on a suspension bridge, you get more aroused than
when you meet them on flat ground. You easily get confused between the excitement
and fear of the dangerous situation, and the normal anxieties of love.”
Her heart always skipped a beat for Kwon Chae-woo when she was in a scary
situation. Whenever something big happened. She needed to know if it was the
situation or if it really was love.
Lee-yeon held Choo-ja by the arms, looking desperate. “So, normal men. As many as
you can find!”

The day, from two weeks ago, still went through her mind. Lee-yeon was anxious
about the police that were coming to take her in; what would happen to them if they
were taken to the station.
Currently Kwon Chae-woo had no ID. That meant they wouldn’t know his resident
registration number. His crazy, scary criminal record might come out if they check his
fingerprints. Also, it could reveal that they were both single and not married.
When Kwon Chae-woo wouldn’t let her go from his embrace, Lee-yeon was trying to
think up a plan. Lee-yeon felt sick that she had to be so deceptive. But she also didn’t
want to be caught.
The police tried to separate them, but Kwon Chae-woo’s strong grip wrapped around
Lee-yeon’s shoulders even harder. Her cheek hurt from being crushed against his
hard chest.
“Kwon Chae-woo,” she mumbled from beneath his arms. “Let’s call your brother.”
His arms weakened and a heavy weight fell against her. Kwon Chae-woo was falling.
Lee-yeon struggled to support his upper body.
“Kwon Chae-woo!”
“Lee-yeon…” He clenched at his forehead, trying not to lose his consciousness.
“Let’s…go…”
She stumbled from his weight, and the police rushed to help her.
“We’ll come with you!” Lee-yeon told the police. “Just take us to the hospital first!”
They were rushed to the hospital in the back of a police cruiser and Kwon Chae-woo
was immediately seen by a doctor. The bullet had only grazed his thigh, but they
needed to stop the bleeding.
“He will need to be admitted for a while,” the doctor informed her.
Lee-yeon looked at Kwon Chae-woo. His lips were busted, he had wounds all over his
body, his cheeks were swollen and bruised, and his eyes had almost swollen shut. He
looked like he had just lost a vicious boxing match.
“His body needs rest,” the doctor continued. “His temperature, pulse, and blood
pressure are all low. I think it’s a good idea for him to have some induced sleep, so his
body can recover.”
“How many days,” Lee-yeon asked.
“Probably three or four, then we will reassess.”
Lee-yeon nodded and they took Kwon Chae-woo away to find him a room. Lee-yeon
accompanied the officers to the police station by herself, so that she could prove she
wasn’t a smuggler. After handing over the photos of the drug farm and cooperating
with all of their questions, they let her go with only a fine for vandalism. She was
happy that she could clear everything up so they wouldn’t have to question Kwon
Chae-woo.
When she finally returned home, she was unable to sleep. She wasn’t used to such a
quiet house. She felt a chill, even though the heat of the summer had permeated the
house. Lee-yeon tried lying on the sofa, lying on her bed, and even went to the second
floor, but the sleepless night continued. It was strange, after everything that had
occurred, that she wasn’t falling over with exhaustion. All she could think of was the
adrenaline was still pumping hard in her veins.
Lee-yeon couldn’t hold it anymore as she curled up on the sofa and made a call.
“Choo-ja, it’s Lee-yeon,” she said when there was a faint hello on the other end.
“What time is it?” Choo-ja asked, half-asleep.
“Three in the morning.”
“Oh my god! Why are you calling so late? How come you’re not sleeping?” Even Chooja’s voice was not enough to fill the silence of the house.
Lee-yeon looked around the living room. The house was full of Kwon Chae-woo stuff. It
seemed like everywhere she looked, she could see his trace. The cup he was drinking
with, the dumbbell he used for exercise, the cushion he was leaned against.
Everything was annoying her.
After filling in Choo-ja with all of the details, she said, “I’m not going to wake Kwon
Chae-woo up tomorrow.” Lee-yeon chewed on her nails while hugging her knees.
“There’s no reason to wake the man up this time, but I keep wanting to wake him up
for some reason.”
“Lee-yeon.”
Her last memory was being curled up like a shrimp and lying beside Kwon Chae-woo’s
side at the hospital. She moaned as the sunlight tried to pry open her closed lids.
Something shaded the brightness that blinded her.
“How is that? Is that better?” Kwon Chae-woo’s voice pulled her completely into a
state of alertness. Her eyes opened. He was smiling faintly at her, with his battered
face. The morning sunshine was beaming through the thin curtains of the hospital
room.
“Why did you take so long to come back. I was waiting. Lee-yeon, I’m hurt.” Lee-yeon
could see the dried tracks of tears on his cheeks.
Lee-yeon realized why she had the temptation to wake up Kwon Chae-woo. He might
have been left alone, trapped in his nightmares. Lee-yeon pulled her sleeve down,
without saying a word, and wiped his eyes.
“You’re the end of this nightmare,” Kwon Chae-woo whispered to her. She stared at
him in shock. “You’re always the end of my nightmares.”
Looking at the man’s hopeful eyes, she realized that he saw her as the only person
that could wake him up from his nightmares. But for Lee-yeon, the words horrified
her. There was something in the back of her mind that was telling her this was all
wrong. An anxiety that she just couldn’t place. It had something to do with herself.
Her life with Kwon Chae-woo played out through her mind. From their first meeting in
the forest, to bondage in bed, the day he grabbed a live chicken, and on and on. She
saw them in front of Hwang Jo-yoon, on top of a 30m tree, in front of a boar, at the
smelly drug farm, on a shaking boat.
There was a power that made her do things she wouldn’t normally do. It might be
because Kwon Chae-woo lived in a world of terror. So, she gets surrounded by that
terror, gets used to it, and gets absorbed by it. She sat up, shaking.
“Lee-yeon, where are you going?” Kwon Chae-woo asked.
As Lee-yeon turned around and met his brown eyes. His eyes travelled over her body,
taking her in. They had power over her, and she couldn’t come out and say what she
has been feeling. Her heart was being torn in pieces. She was supposed to be meeting
with Choo-ja today, to be introduced to “normal” men. She needed to see if her feeling
for Kwon Chae-woo were real or if they were just a product of fear. If she couldn’t
figure out the truth about her emotions, then she would be lost.
“You’re not going to the mountain alone again, are you?” Kwon Chae-woo asked.
“No,” she assured him.
Kwon Chae-woo had always been sensitive to Lee-yeon going out to the wilderness for
work alone. Thanks to that, she had to let Choo-ja do most of the work, at least until
Kwon Chae-woo until recovered a bit.
“Then where are you going?” Kwon Chae-woo pried.
“I’m going to meet a friend.” She simply said.
“You have friends?”
Lee-yeon blushed as she didn’t know how to take that question.
Kwon Chae-woo quickly realized his mistake and tried to explain. “It’s just that no one
else came to see me, and you never brought a guest. I had always assumed that it was
just the two of us, relying on each other.”
His gaze stuck into her like a harpoon. Her heart started beating hard. The anger
quickly dissipated in his eyes, and he lay back on the hospital bed. “They’ll be
releasing me today. I’ll have dinner ready for you when you get home. Come back
early.”
Lee-yeon forced a smile and quickly moved to the door of the hospital room, as if she
had been freed from a trap. As she was about to leave, she heard his voice from
behind her.
“You look pretty today, Lee-yeon.” Kwon Chae-woo glared at her with cold eyes and a
twisted grin on his face.
“Three police officers were replaced, and eight others got fired.” Jang Beom-hee,
wearing his earphone, was still staring out the window at Lee-yeon’s house.
The project, secretly operated inside a remodeled fishing boat, was in the middle of
the ocean. They were completely devastated by the youngest master of the Kwon
Family. A drug boat, photographs of a plastic house, and the Korean-Chinese who
oversaw the fields. There were plenty of incriminating evidence.
Everyone on the boat was arrested and handed over to prosecution. The only article
that was ever published about the incident encouraged the public’s hatred towards
the Korean-Chinese. They were the scapegoats so that the real masterminds of the
crime were sheltered.
The case was made against the Korean-Chinese for secretly cultivating and smuggling
harmful drugs.
What should I do with Chae-woo? Director Kwon sighed. Jang Beom-hee’s face
hardened.
Some of the police officers who had discovered the crime and were unyielding were
punished. While others happily accepted the hush money to sweep the case under the
rug.
However, the person who was in real trouble was Kwon Chae-woo.
My customers were offended. It’s my job as his older brother to punish him for what
he did, isn’t it?

Kwon Chae-woo stood by the window and watched Lee-yeon as she slowly walked
away. His face was indifferent, but his eyes remained unwaveringly focused on her
until she disappeared from his sight.
He sat upright on his sofa. His hands rested on his knees. He didn’t move. He was
frozen as if someone had turned off the power switch inside him. The only way of
knowing whether he was alive was his slow blinking eyes. The moment Lee-yeon left,
Kwon Chae-woo felt as though time had stopped for him.
Existing in a space without Lee-yeon was strange for him. He felt the gravity weighing
him down as he imagined her face in his mind.
‘Where are you going without me? Who are you meeting? Is it a guy? Who is he? How
did you get to know him? He clenched his fist so hard that his knuckled turned white.
These questions seemed highly immature, and he wanted to be calm. But he couldn’t
restrain the anger boiling inside him.
The light-blue blouse and jeans she wore was perfect for the summer. Kwon Chae-woo
had watched, captivated. He had never seen that outfit before. When she got ready in
a hurry and rushed to the door to leave, he had almost wanted to grab her arm and
make her stay.
When are you coming back? He bit his question down. He ran his hand through his
hair and leaned back on the sofa as though he would collapse any minute. It was hard
for him to think of a life without her. After all, he had no memory to fall back on.
Memories form a huge part of a person. Without it, Kwon Chae-woo felt unreal. He did
not seem to exist tangibly. He felt that his emptiness was only filled by Lee-yeon. So,
he rushed to fill himself at her every move and her every word.
So Lee-yeon’s husband. As far as he knew, that was his only identity and his only
value.
Occasionally, he was filled with doubts and distrust, but he brushed them off. If Leeyeon was by his side, he didn’t care. However, So Lee-yeon would still show her back
to him as if trying to test his patience.
Kwon Chae-woo got up from the sofa. He needed to clear his head.

The first man she met was older than her. He was an owner of a small bookstore.
Lee-yeon looked at the man curiously trying to appear nonchalant. His smile did not
leave his face the whole time she talked. He listened to her very attentively and
constantly looked her in the eyes as if she was a very important customer. Lee-yeon
thought the man was very thoughtful.
“What is your favorite tree, Lee-yeon?”
I can feel a high level of EQ in his question. He was the kind of man Lee-yeon tried to
turn Kwon Chae-woo into. Someone kind and thoughtful…
No! Lee-yeon shook her head. Stop thinking about him. I didn’t come all the way here
just to think about Kwon Chae-woo.
Lee-yeon pushed aside her thoughts and tried to focus on the man in front of him. “I
like spruce,” she said as an answer to his question.
“I’ve heard of it. Isn’t that tree usually used to make musical instruments?”
“You’re right.” Lee-yeon smiled.
“Is there any particular reason you like that tree?”
Lee-yeon paused for a moment. “I think because of my childhood memories associated
with it. It has a nice name, too.” She shrugged her shoulders.
“Huh?” The man tilted his head in confusion.
Lee-yeon raised her teacup to her lips. “There was a small tree in the mountain behind
where I lived when I was young.”
The man listened to her politely and intently. She smiled. “It was a small tree, but it
had dense leaves, So, I used to sit under that tree because it gave a lot of shade. This
might sound weird but whenever I sat under it, I could hear a music from somewhere
else. Whenever I leaned back on its trunk, I could hear a melody.” She couldn’t help
smiling at the memory.
“Weren’t you just dreaming?”
Choo-ja had said the same thing when she told her about that. Once, Lee-yeon had
brought Choo-ja to the mountain to prove it to her, but the forest that day was
embarrassingly silent.
“It was real,” said Lee-yeon.
Lee-yeon had climbed the mountain again the next day. The melody drifted to her as if
it had been waiting for her all this time. It was then she realized that the tree only
sang when she was alone.
“Was it a spruce tree?”
“No, it wasn’t.” Lee-yeon shook her head. “I don’t remember clearly. When I went
back there for a visit, the area had been cleared for redevelopment.” Her voice was
dull, but her eyes were filled with certain kind of longing.
“I named it the ‘tree that sings alone’. But I came to understand that some people call
spruce by that name. So, I also started calling it spruce.”
“Sounds like a fairytale.” The man smiled softly.
Bzzzz, Bzzzz.
The man’s phone on the table rang. When he looked at his phone, his face darkened.
“It’s alright. You can take that call.”
The man thanked her and picked up the call. “Yes, Ji Soo…”
He was no longer the calm and attentive man he was a while ago. He fidgeted and
looked out of the window with wet eyes, He seemed anxious.
“Did you feed your baby? How about the medicine? I bought some porridge. Why
didn’t you give him that first?”
Lee-yeon watched him out of the corner of her eyes as she ate her cake.
“Well then… I’ll stop by on my way home.” He pressed his forehead and let out a sigh,
“Don’t say that! I told you.” He raised his voice and gritted his teeth as if he was
trying hard to restrain himself.
Lee-yeon wondered what was wrong as she took another bite of her cake.
“Don’t mind my mother.”
His mother is involved as well?
“Why are you saying this isn’t any of my business? We’ve known each other since
middle school!” said the man, frustrated. “If he’s your child, he’s my child, too.”
As the conversation continued, the sweet cake tasted too repulsive in Lee-yeon’s
mouth. As she took her last bite, she observed the man carefully who changed every
second with that call.
Choo-ja, I think I just heard something hilarious. This guy seems to have a twisted
logic. I am not sure he knows that. He seems considerate but something feels weird….
He’s out.

At a small township office.
The staff, who was sitting at the window, dropped the papers in her hand when she
saw a tall, good-looking guy walk into the office.
The man’s eyes which looked around the office rested on the staff.
“Hello,” the staff greeted, nervously. “How may I help you?”
Kwon Chae-woo stood there for a while as if lost in thought, then raised his eyebrows.
“I came to check on a family relationship certificate.”
His voice held no emotion.
“Can you please provide me with your ID?” It was a question the staff had asked a
countless time but today her voice faltered.
“Do I need to?”
“Yes.”
“I lost it. What should I do if I don’t have it with me now?”
“Ah… then would you kindly fill out an application for reissuance of your ID first?” She
hurriedly handed him a form.
The application form required a resident registration number which he had no idea
about. Kwon Chae-woo frowned. The staff stared at the man frozen over the
application form. Kwon Chae-woo put down his pen and rubbed his temples.
“Can I borrow your phone for a second? I need to call someone.”
“My phone?” the staff asked. It was a little unusual to see someone without a phone
these days. But his eyes, although handsome, looked very threatening, so she obliged.
She pushed her phone forwards on the table.
Kwon Chae-woo picked up the phone and slowly dialed a number. His jaw clenched as
an unpleasant voice answered.
“Hello, it’s me,” said Kwon Chae-woo.
“… Chae-woo?”
There was no hint of emotion in that cold voice. Kwon Chae-woo had the same voice.
He still didn’t know why he felt so hostile towards his brother. His emotion was
completely different from when he had learnt So Lee-yeon was his wife.
“I memorized your number when I was trying to erase it without Lee-yeon knowing.”
There was no response from the other end. Kwon Chae-woo let out a short sigh. “It’s
hard to forget someone as annoying as you.”
A heavy silence followed. The only sound hat was heard from the other end was of the
man tapping on his desk.
“So, what’s the matter?” asked his brother.
“I need my resident registration number.”
A short, dry laugh escaped from Kwon Ki-seok’s mouth. “Looks like your memory isn’t
back yet.”
It was hard to tell whether it was relief or disappointment that was heard in his voice.
“My resident registration number,” repeated Kwon Chae-woo, unwilling to extend the
conversation any more than necessary.
“Why don’t you ask So Lee-yeon?”
He knew that Kwon Ki-seok was trying to provoke him. “Don’t you dare say her
name.”
“She would tear down the sky if you asked her to,” said kwon Ki-seok. “She is quite…
loyal.”
Kwon Chae-woo held the phone a little away from his ears and closed his eyes as
though trying to restrain his anger. With an effort, Kwon Chae-woo held back the
barrage of curse words wanting to erupt from his mouth.
“You’d better not make me repeat myself,” said Kwon Chae-woo coldly.
“What is the name of the document you need, Chae-woo,” said Kwon Ki-seok.
“Family relation certificate.”
Kwon Ki-seok burst out laughing. The tendons stood out on Kwon Chae-woo’s hand
that was holding the phone.
“But it would take some time to get your ID card,” said his brother.
“That’s not your business,” snapped Kwon Chae-woo.
“Of course. But since you managed to surprise me, I will gladly give you a gift.”
Kwon Chae-woo’s eyebrows twitched.
“Wait there for a bit,” said Kwon Ki-seok and ended the call.
Kwon Chae-woo put down the phone on the table with mixed feelings. Several minutes
passed and someone walked out of the door from inside of the office. The man looked
panicked. He was the head of the township office. He half-ran to Kwon Chae-woo
looking very pale.
“We will try our best to reissue your ID within today,” stammered the man. He handed
Kwon Chae-woo a piece of paper with a trembling hand.
Family Relation Certificate.
Kwon Chae-woo quickly looked through the document.

“What do you think marriage is?”
The second man Lee-yeon met was a carpenter close to her age with impressively
thick arms. His tanned skin and loud voice made Lee-yeon flinch. But the man was
very friendly to talk to. The man, who had been chatting endlessly about his hobbies,
suddenly changed the topic with that question.
“Uh…” Lee-yeon hesitated. I think marriage is a… tomb.
The man shrugged his shoulders and placed his huge hands on the table. “Marriage is
a major life event for me.”
Lee-yeon nodded and listened attentively.
“You said you are thirty-two, right?” he asked.
“Yes.”
“Then you’ll probably relate to what I’m saying.”
“Relate to what exactly?” asked Lee-yeon in genuine confusion.
“Showing our parents that we are living a happy life!” said the man, excitedly.
Lee-yeon didn’t know what to say.
“Things have changed, and I wouldn’t expect sacrifices from my wife, of course,” he
said. “I want to go camping or travel abroad for a month with my mother and fatherin-law.” His eyes twinkled. “What do you think about that, Miss Lee-yeon?”
“Ah…” Lee-yeon suddenly found it very difficult to breathe. She knew his intentions
were good. But the moment he had said ‘marriage’, Kwon Chae-woo’s face had drifted
in her mind. She shook her head to brush off the thought. “It does seem like you have
some great plans, but…”
Lee-yeon took a deep breath and smiled. “I don’t really love my family.”
“What?” The man’s eyes widened. Lee-yeon didn’t miss the frown that appeared on his
face for a fleeting moment. Lee-yeon had a sinking feeling in her stomach. The
realization that she might not really be able to meet someone ordinary to enjoy her
time hit her like a blow.
Lee-yeon felt ashamed of herself. She had been rejected and shamed so many times,
and yet she never learnt. She always tried to be someone she was not so that she
could live a life she couldn’t have.
Lee-yeon couldn’t connect with any of the men she met. One couldn’t let go of his first
love, and the other one was a devoted son. Both were wonderful people who were
ready to live together with someone else. But in Lee-yeon’s world, there was no one
there. She only had those trees she had planted. She realized that their world was not
made for her. She might not even be able to live in it, after all.
“You’re all I have and all I need. And I thought this was the same for you, too.”
If only I could hear that again, lamented Lee-yeon. Outside the window, grey clouds
covered the sky slowly darkening the town. Lee-yeon wanted to leave this place and
run home.
The five men she met today all had stories. Stories about their school days or their
families or their dating life. Lee-yeon felt more and more upset as she realized how
disconnected she felt from them. She didn’t have any interesting, typical stories to
share about her life from her past or the present.
“Miss Lee-yeon, what are you thinking about?”
Lee-yeon raised her head in surprise. “Ah… it’s nothing.”
She had to admit to herself that she couldn’t really forget the times she had spent with
Kwon Chae-woo these past few months.
What’s wrong with me?!
The man in front of her took a sip of his coffee. “Miss Lee-yeon, what’s your ideal
type?”
“I… don’t think I have one.”
“Really?”
Lee-yeon’s face darkened. There was something that Hwang Jo-yoon had said that she
couldn’t deny or forget.
“You’re not the kind of woman who can date a man! You hate being with people!”
‘Who in the world would understand a woman who goes to see trees every night and
makes fertilizer at home even on weekends?”
She turned back to the window to watch the pouring rain. Her heart pounded. Her
face turned red. Am I going insane? Lee-yeon rubbed her eyes as if she couldn’t
believe what she saw. Outside the window, she saw a man standing alone in the heavy
rain.
Everyone on the street was running to avoid the rain and take some shelter but Kwon
Chae-woo stood there frozen like a statue, facing the café where she was.

Why is he…
All her attention was now focused outside. The rain fell on the window.
How long has he been standing there? wondered Lee-yeon. Her fingers were cold. She
bit her lower lip anxiously. She felt as though she had been caught doing something
she shouldn’t have.
Kwon Chae-woo had been only staring at Lee-yeon. His gaze shifted from her to the
man sitting across from her. He looked cold and frightening. Lee-yeon got up
suddenly. Her knees bumped the table.
“Lee-yeon?” said the man as he held the corner of the table that almost toppled.
“I am so sorry. I have to go home.”
“Pardon?”
Lee-yeon picked up her bag and looked at the man. He looked confused.
“I am sorry. I think this is a mistake.”
“Sorry?”
“I… um… I think I am more comfortable with someone who has less attachments to
family than I do, I prefer someone who forgot their past history with other women and
chooses to be with only me.”
“Pardon?” His eyes widened.
“My ideal type. I feel comfortable with someone like that,” she continued. “I want to
be with someone who wouldn’t react shockingly when the time comes for me to reveal
my problems. I guess that would only happen if my partner had his own problems.
Otherwise, it will be difficult to understand each other. I don’t like to feel like I am the
only one who is broken.”
“Lee-yeon. That sounds a little dangerous. I don’t know what you are going through,
but you deserve someone better than the ones at the bottom of the barrel.”
She nodded. “You’re right. But usually with trees, they have insect bites mostly at the
lowest level.”
Lee-yeon carried her bag. Her gaze rifted out of the window again. “But chestnuts are
an exception. Those insect bites form a characteristic pattern of the chestnut tree.
Incomplete without them.”
She looked a little solemn, but her voice was firm. Lee-yeon bowed her head and bid
him goodbye. She left the café. When she went out, Kwon Chae-woo was no longer
there. Lee-yeon felt restless and looked around for him.
She checked every alleyway without realizing that her clothes were getting wet.
Someone pulled on her arm. She was pinned to a wall. She recognized the faint scent
before she screamed.
“Kwon Chae-woo.”
His wet shirt was stuck to his chest and showed the outline of his body. His dark air
was wet, and the rainwater flowed down to his nose.
“You’re trying to get rid of me.” He lowered his head. “I can smell it from here.”
Lee-yeon’s neck was stiff. She flinched even at his smallest actions. Her body
trembled. Lee-yeon was familiar with being cornered like this. She clenched her fists.
She wasn’t going to be swayed by his charm anymore. This time, she decided to act
like him. “I can see whoever I want to. I was just trying to have a social life. What
about you? Why are you walking around in the rain?”
Lee-yeon glared at him. “You didn’t tell me you were going out, either. What did you
do this time?” She could feel a vein throbbing in her neck with the stress.
“I went to get my ID,” he said indifferently.
She froze. Her eyes widened.
“You seem surprised, Lee-yeon,” he said.
“Well, that’s because…”
The two of them glared at each other in the rain, getting even more drenched. Leeyeon didn’t know what he was thinking.
“I’m just not enough for you, am I?”
“What?”
“I will never be enough for you. So, you went to meet other men behind my back?” His
voice was sharp and threatening. “Is it because I am not pleasuring you? You
sometimes forget I am your husband. Do you really expect me to open you up by force
when you aren’t ready?”
She looked at him, stunned. Her whole body froze. Kwon Chae-woo frowned and
sighed. He placed his head on her shoulder in defeat.
“Am I that much of a monster? You really can’t separate the present me from you’re
the past version of me who was your husband, huh?” He looked at her pleadingly.
“Isn’t that too much? Do you really enjoy making me go crazy like this?”
Lee-yeon flinched at his gaze. He laughed at her reaction. “I know that I was a
monster in the past. The Kwon Chae-woo you are trying so desperately to hide from
existence. To make me into a new person but what lies have you been telling me?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t even breathe at his words. “What do you mean…?” Did he finally
remember something? Does he remember what he was doing that night? Lee-yeon
fretted.
“Let’s just stop beating around the bush,” he said suddenly. “I know you hate me, Leeyeon.”
“What?” she stammered.
“You think I don’t know that?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t think straight.
“I understand. I know you want to get rid of a person like me who might have hit his
wife and has no means to support his family.”
“What are you even saying… hit your wife?!” Lee-yeon blinked.
Kwon Chae-woo gritted his teeth as he continued, “But I feel wronged. I feel like I am
just starting out clean but since you know about my past and I don’t, it has already
caught up with me without me getting a chance to be something else. How do you
expect me to willingly accept that?” His voice was dry.
“I am so sorry,” he said. “I think I will go all the way with you. This is where I stop
being considerate.”
His large hands grabbed her waist tightly and pulled her closer. The heat in his eyes
scared her. Lee-yeon grabbed the hem of his shirt with her cold hands.
“You didn’t hit me!” she said. “That’s a… misunderstanding. Where did you even get
the idea?”
“I didn’t?”
Lee-yeon opened her mouth as if to say something then shut it again. She remembered
the time when they had first… met. He had been burying a body. She found out. She
was almost murdered.
Kwon Chae-woo grabbed her chin as she tried to avert his eyes. He turned her face to
look at him. He leaned down to her as though he was going to slam into her. He was
so close.
“Then tell me why you are so scared of me,” he said in a low voice. “From the time I
regained consciousness until right now. Why do you flinch at my slightest touch? Why
did you keep calling me ‘Mr. Kwon Chae-woo’ as though you deliberately wanted to
put distance between us? You always try to run away from me. I need to hear it. Tell
me the truth.”
His eyes looked shard. Lee-yeon wanted to run. She regretted coming out of that café.
The raindrops hit her face so hard it stung.
“That’s because… I…”
He stared unwaveringly at Lee-yeon. Her small attempt at distinguishing between her
fear and her fluttering heart had failed. Whenever she saw him, her heart pounded. It
kept messing up the boundary that she set up. She was scared and yet glad to see
him. She wanted to run away and yet she felt like she needed him. Everything crashed
together.
“What are you trying to hide from me?” he asked. Her guilt grew.
“I… I have been lying to you!”
“I know that.”
“No! We never even signed a marriage license!” she closed her eyes and shouted. It
was the first time she had spat out the truth. She didn’t dare open her eyes. The rain
streamed down her face. After a while, when she could only hear silence, she opened
her eyes to see Kwon Chae-woo smiling.
She got goosebumps. His expression wasn’t that of surprise or shock. He looked as
though he expected something like this. He looked at her as though she had lied
again.
“I really can’t be nice to you, can I?”

She didn’t know how they arrived home. “Ahhh!”
His lips crashed onto her violently. His tongue was inside her mouth and trying to
devour her. Her lips were bitten continuously. His weight crushed her. This felt more
like a punishment than a kiss.
His kiss became frantic and even more aggressive. She pushed him with all her might
but Kwon Chae-woo only held her tighter.
The wrist he had grabbed during the taxi ride home smarted. He had looked out of the
window the whole ride while Lee-yeon had stolen some cautious glances towards him.
Lee-yeon had rationalized. Maybe he feels cheated because everything he knew was
now a lie. Maybe the truth of the matter had hit him hard. Lee-yeon realized that she
needed to give him time to process the information about their nonexistent marriage.
But the moment they reached home, he pinned her against the wall and kissed her.
“Kwon…!”
She hadn’t even been able to call his name. His thick tongue was in her mouth. She
poked at his shin with her toe. He finally pulled away, sucking her lips hard.
His eyes were dark. Lee-yeon tried to catch her breath. “Let’s talk about that
misunderstanding.”
The cold eyes were unyielding. Lee-yeon felt so small in front of that gaze. “Kwon
Chae-woo, please…”
“What I am trying to say is that there are couples who live together even without
signing a marriage license…”
Kwon Chae-woo sighed. “Wouldn’t it be better if you just shut that mouth of yours?”
Lee-yeon lowered her head dejectedly. Kwon Chae-woo stared at her lowered head for
a while. He then turned around and took his wet shirt off. Lee-yeon shivered with cold.
She instinctively knew what Kwon Chae-woo was going to do. She felt the air pierce
through her skin.
“I’m sorry for lying,” she said.
Inwardly, she hated being so submissive. But she had to prioritize. Rather than pulling
on his leash, it was better to let go a little. Kwon Chae-woo was shaken by her words
so she needed to tread carefully.
“You are quite enjoying the fact that I have no memory of my past, aren’t you? You
keep lying to me about outrageous things,” he said sarcastically
“What? No… I—”
“It seems you really want to get rid of me since you are now lying about our
marriage.”
“Wait… I wasn’t! I can even prove it,” she said.
“Prove it then,” he said.
“I will get the family relationship certificate tomorrow and show it to you,” she said.
Kwon Chae-woo sighed and took out a folded piece of paper from his coat pocket. He
handed it to her and lifted his chin, gesturing for her to open it. His cold gaze
remained unrelenting on her.
She opened the folded paper and looked at it. She froze as though she had been hit by
a massive wave. She felt paralyzed.
The Family Relations Certificate showed So Lee-yeon as Kwon Chae-woo’s wife no
matter how many times she read it. She was stunned. “What is this?!” This must be
forged, she thought. It has to be forged! How is this possible?
“You are really shameless, aren’t you? Lying outright to my face yet again.”
She remembered the man who was smoking a thick cigar. He had threatened her to
make her life hell if she didn’t agree to him. Wouldn’t it be possible for him to do
something like this and completely alter her life?
“So, that’s why you are meeting other men behind my back. You want to meet
someone ‘kind and warm’ like you wanted and remarry?”
She was at a loss for words.
“It’s easy to convince your dumbass of a husband, isn’t it?” He stared at Lee-yeon
miserably. “You could have convinced me that we never signed a marriage license and
then just run away.” He stroked her neck and grabbed it. “Lee-yeon, how is it that we
aren’t married? How is it that I am not your husband? Tell me once again.” His harsh
voice sounded dangerous.
Lee-yeon winced. “Don’t do anything stupid, Kwon Chae-woo,” she said, aware of his
hand on her neck.
His eyes didn’t look human. Lee-yeon’s heart pounded. Her mouth was dry. His hot
palm melted her wet body.
“Just because you have lied about that, I am not going to be a gentleman today,” he
said. His hand lifted her wet blouse and brushed down her back. He unhooked her
bra. The lips she couldn’t refuse came down on her lips again.
“How could you be so naïve?” he whispered. His lips crashed hard on hers and she
flinched at his hot breath.
She felt cold and chilly, but a heat was rising in her. Her feelings were all mixed.
Since she couldn’t push him away, she wrapped her arms around his back and pulled
him to her. Kwon Chae-woo grunted as though no matter how much they touched; it
wasn’t enough for him. His tongue was aggressive in her mouth. It poked and
explored. His kiss was frantic… almost primal.
She held onto his shoulders as her knees trembled. She felt as though her legs would
give in and she would fall any moment. Kwon Chae-woo lifted her up and she wrapped
her legs around his waist. He carried her to her room. His lips never stopped. She felt
breathless every time his lips sucked on hers.
He pulled away and placed her on the bed. He stared at her as he leaned over her.
Their chests rose and fell frantically as they tried to catch their breaths.
Kwon Chae-woo let out a swear and bit her lips again. His hot tongue skillfully
explored her mouth. He ripped off her clothes. She gasped in surprise as the buttons
rolled on the floor.
“Kwon Chae-woo—”
“Lee-yeon. Don’t. No more lies.” He fumbled with the buckle on her belt. His eyes
were full of lust. She couldn’t tell whether his face was wet because of rainwater or
sweat. “I don’t want to play this charade of being a husband and wife just on the
surface. I want you for real.”
As her bra was already unhooked, her chest was bare. Kwon Chae-woo leaned down
and took it in his mouth. He started sucking on them, making her tremble.
“Ahh,” she gasped. She felt heat rise somewhere below. She could feel his tongue on
her chest crushing her tip. She tried to breathe.
She felt herself becoming wet somewhere down below. She had never felt this hot and
flustered so she didn’t know what to do. She was out of breath. Kwon Chae-woo finally
unbuckled her pants and pulled them down as he gently nibbled on the tip of her
breast.
“Ahhh,” she moaned as he rubbed her most sensitive part. “Kwon Chae-woo…”
He pulled down her panties to her butt and spread her legs wide. He touched her
more. He rubbed the clit between his fingers making her lose all sense of reality. He
clenched his teeth as he felt the soft and sensitive wet part.
“Ahhh, mm!” she moaned. “Kwon Chae-woo, please promise me something.”
He shoved a finger within her without warning. She buckled and leaned over his
shoulder, panting. “Never…ahh… get your memory back. Never. Mmm ahhhh!”
Her body fluid was already wet on his finger. This was the first time he had felt her
insides. It was softer than he had imagined. He was aroused. His eyes filled with
desire. He just wanted to shove his thing inside her without any regard, but he
restrained himself. He was already hard. He looked into her eyes.
“Is that important to you in this situation?” he asked hoarsely.
“Yes,” she sighed in pleasure.
“Would it be… easier for you to accept our relationship if I don’t get my memory
back?” he asked.
She looked at him with shaky eyes. “Yes.”
“Then I won’t.” Kwon Chae-woo nodded pushing his finger deeper into her.
“That’s… that’s not something you can make a promise about,” she said. Whenever his
fingers touched her, she gasped.
“Even so, I’ll try. If my memory is what’s stopping you from spending time with me,
then I don’t need it. I would’ve buried it myself even if you didn’t ask.” He meant it.
He let go of any hopes or desire of having his memories back. It was better to see her
like this, wanting him as much as he wanted her, and if he had to forgo his memory for
it, then so be it. It wasn’t a very difficult choice for Kwon Chae-woo.
“But I need a promise from you too,” he said, thrusting his fingers in and out of her.
She gasped and panted,
“I want you to remember whose wife you are.”
Lee-yeon’s ears turned red as she heard a wet sucking sound from below. She bit her
lips as she felt her lower lips contract and expand. She breathed roughly and started
to sweat.
“Ahhhh…”
Whenever she flinched or her waist buckled, his fingers moved even more roughly.
“If ever you lie to me again or meet some other bastard behind my back….” His lips
came down on her hard. “I am not letting you off the hook so easily.”
He thrust another finger in without a warning and she felt her thighs open wide. Even
though she had surrendered completely, she wanted to open wider. It was a very
strange sensation that Lee-yeon wanted to laugh and cry at the same time.
“Can you imagine how awful my life would be without you?” he said. “But you do need
to be punished if you do something wrong.”
He looked at her. She had swallowed his fingers whole. He felt like he would spin out
of control at this rate. He frowned as he strained against his pants. He wanted to
make her scream in pleasure, but he was afraid she would hate him for it.
“Lee-yeon, like me just a little,” he said, rubbing her sensitive parts and not stopping
his fingers. She moaned. She forgot about being embarrassed because she was naked.
Even though his fingers kept shoving and rubbing her, she was still reluctant.
“Even when I am cruel,” he said, buckling off the belt on his pants. “You of all people
can embrace me.”
“You are my wife,” he said as he pulled down his underwear. He was hard. The thing
was so big it stunned her momentarily.
What the hell is that? Lee-yeon’s face became stiff.
“Why do you act like this is the first time you have seen your husband naked?” he
chuckled.
“Uh well….” She couldn’t think properly. “It’s been a while…” It’s my first time seeing
a man naked…
“Ah, right. I was in vegetative state.” He rubbed himself. Lee-yeon swallowed.
She knew about intercourse between a man and a woman. But she had never
imagined it would feel this obscene. It looked like that thing would give her more pain
than pleasure.
“Well, this might be a problem, Lee-yeon.”
He took the rest of Lee-yeon’s pants and undergarments off completely and crawled
over her. “I have no memory of doing it with you…”
He grabbed her chest and fondled it. “I am a virgin in that sense.” She could feel his
hardness at her entrance. “So, you will have to guide me since you have more
experience.”
Of course, he knew what to do even if he had no memory, but he wanted to involve
Lee-yeon more actively. “You said we weren’t good at it.”
“Uh… yes…”
“Well, let’s try it from the beginning.”
He kissed her behind her ears to her collarbone, down to her chest and her
bellybutton. He trailed kisses after kisses on her as he gently pried her thighs open
again.
“A person tends to get really hungry when a delicious meal is in front of him,” he said.
She felt his nose touch her down below. He spread her wide. Her waist buckled in
anticipation.
His tongue found its way in and licked like a dog. It rubbed against her most sensitive
part and made her wet. He pressed down on her clit and sent her reeling at the edge
of consciousness.
Lee-yeon moaned. His hands crushed her butt. As he kept shoving his tongue in, she
climaxed. Kwon Chae-woo sucked on her fluids.
“Mm… Ahh!”
She trembled. She felt so exhausted that she couldn’t move but she wanted more.
“I am sorry I don’t know what I am supposed to do,” he said mockingly as he rubbed
her below. His eyes gleamed.
He poised between her legs. His hardness seeking entrance. The veins around his
neck popped as though he was trying so hard to retrain himself.
He could wait any longer. She clenched the sheets in her fist as he thrust into her. He
could feel him hot and hard inside her. She swallowed her scream. He cursed but she
couldn’t hear him.
At first, she was blinded by pain as he filled her completely. But slowly the pain
subsided as he slid out halfway. An odd pleasure filled her instead. She could feel a
heat build up within her. Kwon Chae-woo grabbed her hips and pushed himself in
again. She couldn’t withhold her moans.
“Lee-yeon, was it like this the first time for you too? fuck, it’s so good I am going to
die,” he said roughly.
He thrust in and out. The sound reverberated in the room. His other hand was on her
chest. He could see she was aroused too. He got even more excited at the sight. He
slid out halfway and shoved in harder.
“Mm… Ahhh!”
Lee-yeon was so deeply moved by the pleasure that she felt afraid. She felt her body
heating up and then cooling down at the same time. All emotions and feelings were
jumbled inside her. She felt so confused at this strange sensation.
“Hmmm…”
Her insides felt as though they contracted and expanded not knowing what to do with
it. Kwon Chae-woo moaned at the feeling. He sank his teeth into her neck and thrust
harder, unable to control himself. Her insides swallowed him whole.
“Lee-yeon… Lee-yeon,” he moaned. He grabbed at her chest and kissed her.
Her body trembled, close to another climax. “Kwon Chae-woo… I…uhhh…”
She panted.
“No,” he said. He lifted one of her legs and placed it on his shoulder to open her wide
so that it would be easier for her. The eyes that looked at Lee-yeon looked feverish. He
thrust again while she moaned.
“Call me Chae-woo…,” he grunted.
His hard shaft went deeper. As he rubbed against her, it pierced something deep
inside her. She couldn’t control herself anymore. The pleasure was impossible.
“Hng…. Ahhhh!” she moaned.
Lee-yeon’s insides squeezed tighter. Kwon Chae-woo closed his eyes and groaned. He
gritted his teeth. When he saw her hard nipples and her neck, he wanted to come so
badly. He was barely able to hold back.
She moaned and grabbed the pillow tightly as Kwon Chae-woo’s thrusts became
frantic. His length was shoved so hard and fast that she felt scared for a moment. This
was truly an act of animals. She felt as though she would die momentarily every time
he thrust inside her and was out of breath.
“It’s strange, Lee-yeon,” he whispered hoarsely as he thrust in and out of her. “Why
does it seem like you are a virgin to me?”
His eyes that looked at her were confused. He looked at her body below him. Her face
seemed flustered. Her body trembled. Her hands didn’t embrace him, not even a little.
It was almost like she didn’t know what to do with her body in this situation.
“Why does it seem like it’s your first time?” he asked. “It doesn’t make sense. We were
married way back.”
She bit her lower lips trying to keep her pleasure under control and averted his eyes.
As he moved frantically against her, she couldn’t help but moan again.
“Tell me, Lee-yeon,” he whispered. “Why do you act so timid?”
She couldn’t speak. He couldn’t make sense of anything except him inside her and the
pleasure that it gave. Her walls were torn down. Her mind was blank.
“Did… the previous Kwon Chae-woo didn’t do it like this?” he thrust into her, and her
fluid flowed out. “Hmm… is that it?”
Kwon Chae-woo grunted, grabbed her thighs and pushed himself even more in a
hurry. I haven’t done much and she is already… As he thrust inside her, he caressed
her lower part. It wasn’t enough. Lee-yeon felt like she was going to burn with the
heat.
“Tell me,” he whispered. “Do I feel like a foreign man?”
He was panting now. His eyes looked bloodshot. Lee-yeon knew that question came
out of jealousy. “How could we have been sexually incompatible, Lee-yeon? This feels
so good. It was a lie, wasn’t it? You are a liar.”
He buried his head onto her chest. Her body felt too hot. Her mind was completely
blank.
“That bastard probably did it every day. Can’t I do it a little?” he said hoarsely.
He buried his head onto her chest and refused to look at her. He grunted as he shoved
inside her. Lee-yeon panted. The pleasure was too overwhelming.
“I’m your husband now, so you should spread only for me,” he said in a low voice.
“You said we didn’t do it. Do you know what your inside is like? Just who do you think
I am that you’re suddenly so welcoming?”
His thrusts became rough. “Why won’t you touch me?” he asked. “Why won’t you
touch me even a little?”
She felt like she was on fire. His body was too hot. She was going to burn.
“It’s fun to watch you like this. Somedays you hold onto me tightly as if out of some
damned responsibility. But some other day, you meet someone else. You are just too
much.”
He let out a moan. His eyes shone like a beast’s. One hand held her down while the
other caressed her. Lee-yeon felt as though her mind might turn completely into
mush.
“Chae-woo…,” she whimpered.
Kwon Chae-woo heard her tiny voice. His hips, that thrust so hard that it was sending
her reeling to the edge, suddenly stopped. He stared at her.
“Don’t you look down on me, you idiot,” she said, panting. “It’s reasonable for
someone to not be that good in bed. Not everyone’s the same! If the one who is bad in
bed is me, so what? I am the one who consented to sleep with you. Why are you
making me feel incompetent?!”
Her anger was justified. She didn’t know what to do with her body because she had
never done this before. And she couldn’t understand all the strange feelings. Even so,
he didn’t need to spell it out to her.
“You are really so heartless. You have no kindness. No bedroom manners, that’s for
sure.”
Kwon Chae-woo was stunned. She grabbed her waist and lifted her up to sit on his
thigh. Lee-yeon wrapped her arms around his shoulders instinctively.
Somehow, his hardness found its way back into her. She gasped. She let out a low
moan as he moved against him. Kwon Chae-woo liked seeing her like this. He couldn’t
take his eyes off her face.
As she moved against him, he slid his hand down and touched her below. She buckled.
‘That’s right. Fill yourself up as much as you want to, Lee-yeon,” he whispered.
Kwon Chae-woo held her tight. He kissed her neck and on her cheek. She felt
flustered but she kept moving against him. She dug her nails into his shoulders. She
moved faster and harder until she felt as though she couldn’t anymore. He laid her on
the bed and continued thrusting into her, most gently. She looked up at him. This was
the first time she had gathered to see him as he was.
He moaned and slid out of her, spraying her belly with a white liquid. He sounded as
though he was ready to retire anytime soon and settled himself beside Lee-yeon who
looked just as exhausted. Kwon Chae-woo, after a while, raised his head from her
shoulders and looked at her.
“You look more beautiful when you are messy.” He smiled and pulled her close to him.
Lee-yeon could only stare at him as he slept.
A moonless dawn. Someone staggered across the backyard.
The figure dragged itself as though it couldn’t walk properly. It was Lee-yeon who had
come out secretly after Kwon Chae-woo had drifted off to sleep.
Someone had said it right, at the end of pleasure was only pain. She felt all the
muscles in her body ache. Her lower place hurt a lot. It felt strange as though he was
still inside her.
She still remembered his eyes, his moans, his skin against hers… If she let her guard
down even for a few seconds, her mind drifted off to that moment.
“Phew….” She sat on the wooden stool and sighed. I made a mistake. A huge one…
Lee-yeon rubbed her face. She felt tired. Kwon Chae-woo was still in her mind but it
didn’t make her happy. She felt like she could never be happy. It felt like she had dug
her own grave this time.
Lee-yeon stared at her phone and scowled at the name that popped up. Kwon Ki-seok.
He picked up the phone on the first ring. He always did when she called.
She was enraged. He was the one behind this mess. She understood why Choo-ja had
smacked her on her back when she found out that she had slept with Kwon Chae-woo.
Choo-ja was worried that this would get more complicated if emotions were involved.
She took a deep breath.
“Kwon Chae-woo, please promise me something. Never…ahh… get your memory back.
Never.”
“Then I won’t.”
Lee-yeon closed her eyes and sighed. Then she opened it again with a twisted
determination settling in her heart. She had a white handkerchief in her hand.
When she unfolded it, there was a thin gray string nestled there. She had hidden it
two years ago. Kwon Chae-woo’s string.
He had attacked her with this string in the forest that day. He had wrapped it around
her neck and had almost killed her.
Is it used in some kind of a factory? It’s thin like an aluminum string, but hard and
elastic…
Lee-yeon turned on the lighter and set fire to the string. I will do the same. I will never
remember that day again…
Her heart pounded as though she was doing something wrong. Kwon Chae-woo was
sometimes rough but he was nice to her. He couldn’t even wake up if she wasn’t by his
side. He worried about being abandoned by her. All of it held her together and
strengthened her resolve.
She threw the burning string on the ground and covered it with dirt. That night she let
go of everything…

“Lee-yeon, it’s time to wake up,” said a gentle voice.
But she was too tired. She snuggled deeper into her blanket. She smelled coffee. A
rough but gentle hand brushed her hair back from her face.
She opened her eyes with difficulty to see a tray with coffee and sandwich. Along with
the man who had made them for her.
“Did you sleep well?” He smiled radiantly.
“Uh…”
The sunlight seeped through the curtains and brightened the room. After a pause,
Lee-yeon’s face turned red.
She was embarrassed to see him. Lee-yeon pulled the blanket all the way up and hid
inside it. Kwon Chae-woo didn’t like that she was trying to avoid the whole situation,
but he understood that it was only natural.
According to Choo-ja, the first experience for a woman is 80% hype. She would always
say that men would come at you as though they could do something amazing, but it
ended up being nothing much. But Lee-yeon knew better. She had almost blacked out.
Choo-ja, it was me who offered nothing in return! When Lee-yeon woke up, she saw
that everything had changed. She had been cleaned and dressed in fresh new
pajamas. Her ripped clothes were nowhere in sight. The stained bedsheet was gone
too. The room looked clean. It looked like nothing had happened here last night.
Lee-yeon looked around in confusion. She wondered if she had imagined it but the
throbbing pain between her legs said otherwise.
When she realized that he had cleaned everything, including her, she blushed.
“Lee-yeon.” He pulled the blanket away. Messy hair covered her eyes. He leaned over
to her.
“Thank you very much for yesterday!” she blurted out. “I appreciate your hospitality.”
He laughed. “This feels weird,” he said, looking at her in amusement. “I feel like you
will have me a couple of bucks to use it for the taxi to go home.”
“What?”
“Do you really want to say that after what we did yesterday, Lee-yeon?”
“Ah. No…”
“I might have surprised you more than expected. I guess I went harder on you
because you wouldn’t even touch me a little.” He smirked. “But I am glad you
appreciate my ‘hospitality’.”
Lee-yeon opened her mouth to retort but Kwon Chae-woo changed the subject. “Does
it hurt anywhere?” he asked.
“Well, the way you manhandled me last night, what do you think?” She didn’t want to
be nice to the man who was teasing her early in the morning.
Kwon Chae-woo bit on his lips to hold back his laughter. “I wanted to talk to you about
something.”
“What is it?” she asked.
“The way you lied yesterday.”
Lee-yeon lowered her head in shame. It was not good for a legally married woman to
see other men behind her husband’s back. Although she wasn’t married to him for
real, she still felt guilty. She felt like her parents had cheated on their spouses. She
felt ashamed.
“I am going to tell you this again,” said Kwon Chae-woo. “It doesn’t matter what you
do. You won’t be able to rip me off with those tiny hands.”
He was about to touch her hair when she flinched. Lee-yeon covered her face with her
hands. She felt suffocated.
“Lee-yeon,” he called her name gently.
“It was all my fault,” she mumbled. Her voice trembled. Kwon Chae-woo looked at her.
“I really wasn’t planning on it. I wasn’t seeing other men in the way you think. I was
just… curious. I wanted to see how other men were different from you. Whether my
heart pounded for them like the way it does for you. I just wanted to check.”

“Because I really…”
Lee-yeon couldn’t utter the words. Kwon Chae-woo stared at her. She didn’t remove
her hands from her face.
“I just… you are so scary. I am afraid of you when I think about the kind of person you
used to be. When you said you would be my dog, it was a little better to be with you. I
always looked at you while you slept…”
Kwon Chae-woo raised his eyebrows when he heard this. “It’s the first time I feel so
annoyed with someone,” she continued in a soft voice. “Everyday feels annoying
because of you.”
“What do you mean?” he asked. And why are you blushing? Your ears are turning
red…
He put the tray away on the side table. He leaned over to her and gently pulled her
hands from her face. But she turned away from him and averted his eyes.
“I didn’t think I’d get caught. No, I meant I didn’t think it would turn out like this.”
She tried to wriggled her way into the blanket again.
Kwon Chae-woo softly grabbed her trembling wrist. “Lee-yeon. Look at me.” She
shook her head.
He pulled the blanket away and kissed the back of her hand softly. She flinched. “If
you want to hide, a blanket isn’t enough.”
He pulled her to him and hugged her tightly. She felt a strange comfort in his hands.
“So, what was it like comparing me to other men? I want to hear the result.”
Lee-yeon squirmed against his chest. He waited patiently. “I didn’t think of anything. I
saw you through that window in the café.”
She remembered vividly the way he had stood outside that window, in the pouring
rain.
“I just wanted to go home,” she mumbled. “With you.”
He hugged her tighter. “If that’s the case, then why do you keep pushing me away?
Look at me.”
Lee-yeon turned her head and looked at him.
“Tell me, has something changed about me?” he asked.
When she looked at him, she just recalled what had happened yesterday. The way he
had kissed and licked her down there…
Her face flared red, and she couldn’t meet his eyes. Did everyone live a life like that at
night? Wondered Lee-yeon. This was all such a new experience.
“Uh….” She stared at him. That was such a random question. If she thought about it,
she realized that his eyes were back to normal and there was no predatory gleam
there like yesterday. His clothes were buttoned up neatly. But all this just reminded
her of how he had been yesterday: raw and naked. She blushed again. She coughed
and cleared her throat. “Uh… I guess you look a bit more handsome?
Kwon Chae-woo smirked and opened his mouth to say something. She quickly
changed her words.
“No? Then… has your skin got better? Your face looks clean.”
Kwon Chae-woo smiled. His gaze was so intense that it reminded her of last night
again.
“Thank you for the compliment,” he said. “But my face was clean when I woke up.”
“Then?”
Kwon Chae-woo lowered his head and kissed her. He wrapped his arms around her
tightly and she melted like cream.
“There was no trace of crying,” he said.
She realized that was true! Even when she had sneaked out a little bit around dawn,
she hadn’t heard him sobbing! She looked at him, surprised. She smiled brightly.
“What do you think the reason was, Lee-yeon?”
“Uh… I don’t know?”
As she thought about it, he smiled. “I think I do.”

She finished the sandwich and coffee he had made for her and locked herself in her
office for two whole hours. She could hear Kwon Chae-woo washing the dishes and
vacuuming the house.
She was curious to see why he was doing house chores, but she wasn’t confident
enough to go outside and face him.
“Seems like sex avoids even nightmares.” Thankfully the man didn’t barge into the
office.
Lee-yeon scratched her head and tried not to think about it. Lee-yeon spent her
morning hiding in the office. She then decided to take care of her garden. She
sneaked outside and pulled some weeds. She was then preparing the hose to water
her garden when she heard a voice.
“Is Director So Lee-yeon here?”
The gate of the Spruce Tree Hospital opened. Joo Dong-mi, who was wearing quite a
large jacket, walked in. She smiled as her eyes met Lee-yeon’s.
“Howdy!” Mature yet playful. Respectful yet rowdy.
“Hello. What brings you here?” Lee-yeon shut the hose.
Joo Dong-mi looked around the area as though she was looking for someone else. Leeyeon’s face darkened.
“Isn’t that employee here yet?” she asked.
“He is inside but why are you…?”
Joo Dong-mi smiled radiantly. “I wanted to say something to him.”
Lee-yeon clenched the hose tightly.
“Is it okay if I go in and talk with him for a moment?” asked Joo Dong-mi. She
scratched her head and looked at Lee-yeon. “I will tell you the truth, I like him and
would like to—,”.
Lee-yeon’s face became stiff. “Ms. Joo Dong-mi,” she interrupted. “Actually, there is
something I need to tell you.”
She dropped the hose and wiped her hands on the side of her pants. It was scary for
Lee-yeon to speak the truth.
She had only learnt to hide the truth. The truth about her parents. The family she lived
with. The truth about her birth. She had never interacted with anyone enough to talk
to them honestly. But today, she wanted to tell the truth. She didn’t want to let go of
something she cherished so easily.
She wanted to stand her ground. Otherwise, everyone would be like her cousins who
always wanted to ruin her life by taking away everything she had.
“He’s not really my employee but my…”
Joo Dong-mi’s eyes widened. “He is not an employee here?!”
Lee-yeon flinched as Joo Dong-mi stepped close to her. She was just too enthusiastic a
person to deal with.
“Yes, he is not an employee. Instead, he is my boy—”
“Your boy toy?” said Joo Dong-mi eagerly.
“What?! No!” said Lee-yeon, stunned.
“So… he is your boy toy. Wow!”
Lee-yeon was actually speechless. She stared blankly at Joo Dong-mi.
“You look so innocent, but you are like me! Don’t worry, your secret is safe with me,”
said Joo Dong-mi. “It’s good to know.”
Joo Dong-mi extended her hand in a handshake. Lee0yeon shook her hands in a daze.
“A woman should indeed have a boy toy or two, if you ask me,” she said eagerly.
Who the hell is this person? She is like a mini Choo-ja…. Lee-yeon opened her mouth
to respond but Joo Dong-mi wouldn’t give her a chance.
“It’s a waste to marry and be committed to a person. You shouldn’t let him move
beyond your pants,” said Joo Dong-mi sagely.
Lee-yeon nodded blankly. This was the weirdest conversation she ever had.
“Do you drink?” Joo Dong-mi suddenly asked.
“No. I don’t.”
“Wow! Then you do it sober? I can’t have fun sober,” Joo Dong-mi looked at her in
reverence. “I was getting lonely on this tiny island. Nobody wants to just have fun
without commitments. But you, you don’t hide it! I honestly respect you. I drink like a
fish. Could we drink together sometimes? Have a long talk?”
Lee-yeon was awkward. She never had anyone be this friendly to her. But right then,
Joo Dong-mi said something to her that annoyed her greatly.
“Then can I borrow him?” she asked. “Please, Director! Please give him to me!”
Lee-yeon couldn’t help but let the words slip through her lips. “You can’t.”
Then, Kwon Chae-woo stepped into the room, interrupting her thoughts. Lee-yeon felt
her heart pound against her chest, as if she had been caught doing something she
wasn’t supposed to. All the while, Kwon Chae-woo eyed her carefully and stepped
towards her.
At the sight of the man, Joo Dong-mi’s eyes lit up. She had found her prey. “Howdy!”
she greeted enthusiastically. “I came here to ask you something.”
Kwon Chae-woo glanced at her before turning back to Lee-yeon, uninterested in Joo
Dong-mi’s antics.
“Why are you out?” he asked Lee-yeon. “Are you hurt?”
When she didn’t answer, he took his cardigan off and wrapped it around her, rubbing
her neck with his hot palm—a touch that could only be shared by two people who had
done so much more. Lee-yeon straightened her back, pushing away her lewd thoughts.
“Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo repeated. “Are you hurt?”
“I’m fine.” Lee-yeon shook her head then looked up at Joo Dong-mi. “She has a
question for you.”
Grinning, Joo Dong-mi fished a business card from her bag and held it out for Kwon
Chae-woo to take. “Let me introduce myself again,” she said. “I’m Joo Dong-mi from
the Mammal Team for Wildlife Rescue Center.” She smiled at Kwon Chae-woo. “And
I’m here to scout you.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened at Joo Dong-mi’s words. When she noticed that Kwon Chaewoo hadn’t moved, she poked his side and motioned for him to take the card.
But, lost in his thoughts, Kwon Chae-woo just stared off at the leaves falling on the
ground.
Unphased, Joo Dong-mi continued with her plastered smile. “I tried to talk to him at
the party,” she explained. “But he wasn’t listening.”
She remembered that night, how she had been completely ignored, how Kwon Chaewoo hadn’t taken his eyes off Lee-yeon the entire time. It was almost as if he was
trying to count her eyelashes with how intently he was gazing at her. It had bothered
Joo Dong-mi more than she would have liked to admit.
She tried to brush the memory away. “Your stamina, reflex, and creativity,” she
continued. “I want it all.”
It was true. At first, she sought him for herself, but she never really did have a habit of
hanging onto a man for very long. Especially not the way that Kwon Chae-woo was
evidently hanging onto this tiny woman, Lee-yeon.
It was almost like the Japanese Mastiff’s characteristic of never letting anything go
after you had it. He was so focused on Lee-yeon that just the thought of having to
focus on anything else would have aggravated him.
With how she was with animals, Joo Dong-mi didn’t typically use her head to deal with
situations, choosing instead to trust her instincts. It was what fed her hunger. It was
what made her want to become the youngest member of the team at 24.
The biggest problem for Hwaido was the lack of manpower. It was a place full of
mountains and wildlife that required a certain amount of strength to deal with. A
young, unemployed man living on the island was a commodity that had to be used to
their advantage.
While all the other employees at the center were also busy looking for a successor, Joo
Dong-mi was the only one who had been aggressive about it.
“We need someone with basic education or a license, but, of course, I can help with all
of that,” Joo Dong-mi said. “You’ll just need to follow instructions, carry an axe or a
stake, and I, your senior, will take care of the rest.”
Joo Dong-mi could tell that Kwon Chae-woo wasn’t listening to her, so she turned to
Lee-yeon instead, deciding to use the dynamic between the two of them to her
advantage.
“What do you find attractive in men, Lee-yeon?” she asked.
“Me?” Lee-yeon’s eyes widened.
“Yes,” Joo Dong-mi smiled. “Family men are more the trend these days. But they
typically work too, don’t they?”
Lee-yeon nodded. “That’s true.”
Joo Dong-mi continued. “But they’d have to earn the money legally, right?”
“Of course,” Lee-yeon said.
“Then,” Joo Dong-mi added, “wouldn’t you want a man who could handle responsibility
and do good deeds? A man who is employed?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened as she realized what Joo Dong-mi was getting at. Kwon Chaewoo, realizing this too, turned away from Lee-yeon and stared sharply at the other
woman.
‘Can I ever treat him like a junior?’ Under his gaze, Joo Dong-mi felt herself stiffen.
She didn’t how she could treat this man as her junior at work, but she knew she had to
pull through if she wanted the best for herself.
“A man who is good at night is all well and good,” Joo Dong-mi said, trying to sound as
calm as possible. “But a man who is great during the day gets the wife’s respect.”
Before Kwon Chae-woo could even react, Lee-yeon frowned. “But Kwon Chae-woo is
sick,” she said. “If he has to run around too much or lift heavy things, it would be
dangerous.” She looked at Kwon Chae-woo at her side. “He won’t recover.”

The truth was that she didn’t want him near an axe now that he was starting anew. While there was no denying Kwon Chae-woo’s old personality, there was no need to
bring him back to his old ways now, not when things were so normal.
“And he isn’t used to being around others anymore,” she added. “I’m afraid I’ll have to
keep him home for now.” She tried to use words that wouldn’t portray him in a bad
way.
Kwon Chae-woo grimaced at the kindness Lee-yeon had offered him, but he couldn’t
let himself do as she wished. He pulled her towards him.
“W-what?”
“You can’t expect nothing of me,” he told her. “That’s not my style.” Before Lee-yeon
could say something, he added, “I want your attention. I don’t need your protection.”
Kwon Chae-woo turned to Joo Dong-mi. “I’ll contact you after discussing things with
my wife,” was what he said, but, really, he just wanted the woman to get out.
Joo Dong-mi blinked. “Your wife?” she asked, looking between the two of them. She
looked at Lee-yeon. “He’s your husband?!”
While Joo Dong-mi liked men, the thought of a husband was too much for her. She
paled as Lee-yeon turned away, avoiding her gaze. ‘Why would you do that to me, Leeyeon?’ she exclaimed. Lee-yeon never clarified to her that she was indeed this man’s
wife. She looked up at Kwon Chae-woo again and felt a chill run through her spine at
the thought of his marriage to the director. It just didn’t make sense.
‘Aren’t tame people supposed to be with tame people as well?’
Unable to keep herself composed and with no intention of separating them, Joo Dong- mi turned on her heel and left.
There was silence in the yard after the door shut.
“Lee-yeon, are you embarrassed of me?” Kwon Chae-woo asked suddenly.
Lee-yeon looked at him. “Pardon?”
“Just tell me that you’re embarrassed that I’m talentless and jobless,” he said. “Or is it
something else? I feel like I already know.”
Lee-yeon looked away from him. Kwon Chae-woo realized that his suspicions were
true. She still didn’t trust him.
“I don’t care if you lock me up here because you want to protect me.” He grabbed the
back of her neck to make her look at him. “But you should only be doing that out of
love, not because you’re afraid I’ll turn into a monster the moment I leave alone, not
because you don’t trust me.”
“I promised yesterday that I’d try my best,” he told her. “That I’d bury it myself. You
think that was a joke?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes shot up towards him. “That’s not it,” she said. “I was… jealous.”
“So you’re going to live in fear of that all the time?” Kwon Chae-woo asked. “You don’t
seem to realize the weight of your words.” He watched as Lee-yeon looked away from
him. “Even if I go back to the old me, why would things change between us?” he spat.
“I’m all over you, so why are you scared?”
Lee-yeon looked at him and found both anger and sadness in his eyes. “I’m sorry!” she
choked out. “I know it’s unfair. I just can’t control my feelings!”

“I don’t care if you work,” Lee-yeon admitted further. “But I can’t take you working
with another woman.”
“With another woman?” Kwon Chae-woo asked.
“I’m a bit jealous,” Lee-yeon told him. She could feel the embarrassment bubble up
with her. Jealousy wasn’t exactly something she was proud of.
Then, Kwon Chae-woo pulled her out of her thoughts and into a searing kiss. It was
rushed and frenzied, and Lee-yeon opened her lips to let him slip his tongue through.
Their tongues clashed against each other, hot and wet.
Lee-yeon could still feel her fears despite the kiss. It was not something she could be
rid of easily and she knew that, at the end of the day, there would always be a part of
her that didn’t trust Kwon Chae-woo.
He had never been in a relationship before so he was certain in theirs in ways that
Lee-yeon couldn’t be. The killer and the witness, plaintiff and defendant. He didn’t
know what she was keeping from him.
Even so, she pushed all of that aside and stretched her arms out. She would accept
what she could take even if everything felt unreal.
Kwon Chae-woo wrapped his arms around her and pulled her into an embrace, still
keeping his lips pressed against hers. Lee-yeon tried not to think about what they
looked like, with his large build towering over her. They were twisting and turning,
practically sucking on each other.
Lee-yeon realized that what other people did to her—pointing at her, beating her,
cussing her out—became different when Kwon Chae-woo did it. Every action
contained affection. Even if he came in hard and hurt her, deep inside, she felt like a
child being caressed warmly.
But she had lied. She had lied about things that would come out sooner or later. Whatever fleeting moments they shared now wouldn’t last forever.
Lee-yeon felt sick as she remembered that these are all an illusion.
“If I don’t remember anything, our relationship will get easier?” He had told her
before, which she answered a treacherous “yes”.
Lies are being piled up.
Even so, she wanted to live a normal life, so she could cherish memories of this time
forever.
It was all an hourglass that Lee-yeon had flipped, and the sand was slipping quickly.
Finally pulling his lips away, Kwon Chae-woo grinned at her. “I think it would be a
good idea if I worked,” he said. “Your reaction is really turning me on. It’sgetting
harder.”
Lee-yeon was dumfounded and blushed at his bluntness, trying her best to restrain
herself from looking down..
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her. “I’ll work,” he told her. “No matter what the work may
be.”
Lee-yeon bit her lip. She didn’t know how Kwon Chae-woo would handle being an
animal rescuer. He seemed more like the type to hunt them.

Joo Dong-mi stared at the door as it closed behind her. She hoped Lee-yeon would
forgive her for her actions towards her husband. It wasn’t right to meddle in the
business of another family, much more show interest to a married man right in front of
his wife.
She turned around a corner scratching her head, feeling ridiculous of how things
turned out when suddenly she saw something which piqued her interest.
‘I feel like I’ve seen him somewhere before…. But where?’
She caught sight of a man leaning against the wall of the house. She would have just
walked by, but his physique reeled her in. It was rare to see a man like this in Hwaido.
And it was also strange to see one hanging about in the middle of the week.
Most of all, he looked very familiar to her.
“Hey there,” she smiled.
As she approached, Jang Beom-hee flinched. He had expected her to walk past him,
but now she was looking right at him. He pulled his cap down but that didn’t stop Joo
Dong-mi from trying to get a proper look at him.
“Howdy!” she said. “Do you live nearby?”
He didn’t answer but she could see his throat bob.
“I work for the Wildlife Rescue Center,” Joo Dong-mi explained, showing the logo on
her jacket.
Ignoring her, Jang Beom-hee tried to walk away. But Joo Dong-mi stopped him. She
was used to herding animals.
“I have no bad intentions,” she said. “But have we met before? Your face seems
familiar.”
Jang Beom-hee tried to evade her gaze, but he failed.
“Oh! I remember!” Joo Dong-mi exclaimed. “You’re the server that took my glass at
my uncle’s party!”
The man became flustered right away.
Jang Beom-hee knew Joo Dong-mi, of course. He knew everyone that knew the young
master and Lee-yeon. It was also partly a mistake when he took her glass, he had
hoped she wouldn’t have remembered him for that.
“I knew it,” Joo Dong-mi smiled to herself. “I recognize people pretty easily. But your
clothes…” She stepped back a little to study him. “Are you a police then?” Jang Beomhee froze, and Joo Dong-mi pouted.
She looked down at his clothes, even if he already knew what he was wearing. He had
been using his police uniform after wrapping up an incident at the drug farm. How
could he be so unlucky? Why did someone have to recognize him?
Instinctively, he reached into his pocket and clutched his small knife.
“What is it about this town?” Joo Dong-mi laughed, completely oblivious to the man’s
discomfort. “There seems to be so many people with the perfect physique nowadays.”
She rubbed the back of her neck. “But why was a police at my uncle’s party? Was it
like an undercover thing? Did my uncle get involved in some money laundering? He’s
not a bad person but he seems like the type to something like that.”
As Joo Dong-mi reached up to rub her chin, Jang Beom-hee pushed her off and started
to walk away.
“Hey! What’s your name?!” Joo Dong-mi persisted. “How old are you?!”
Just as she was about to say something else, Jang Beom-hee grabbed her collar and
slammed her against a wall.
“Don’t get in my way,” he finally said, his voice grave. He let her go but, just as he was
about to leave, a flying kick threw him off. Before he could regain his balance, she had
already wrapped a rope around his ankle and pulled him in.
“Can police even do that to a citizen?” she demanded. “What are you, you bastard?”
Jang Beom-hee glanced at the door nervously. If Kwon Chae-woo came out now, it
would be very bad. Jang Beom-hee’s job was to protect the Young Master and keep
Hwaido under control. His role wasn’t supposed to cause a commotion like this.
Deciding on the best course of action, he lowered his body and covered Joo Dong-mi’s
mouth with his hand. “Just be quiet first,” he said. He sighed and ran a hand over his
face. “What is it that you want?”
Joo Dong-mi’s eyes lit up.
“I said let’s do well together!”
Treating as many trees as possible within the time limit was the task. Lee-yeon, after
coming into the closed town for the second test, glared at Kwon Chae-woo with her
lips all swollen.
The messiness of the town reflected how she felt. It was almost summer. Lee-yeon
wore a jumpsuit and stomped away.
“Who forgot to tell me in 24 hours, Lee-yeon?”
“I said it’ll only be overnight!”
“Outdoor camping in the middle of the mountain. Sleeping on a plank at the bottom
part of the mountain slide—” The judge could be heard from afar.
Kwon Chae-woo composed himself while he listened to the judge. It seemed like he
prefers beating the crap out of thugs than the prospect of Lee-yeon sleeping outdoors
for a night.
She was annoyed at the man looking after her like a mother hen, but she also wanted
to laugh. She didn’t know how to react. She wasn’t familiar with receiving such
attention.
The opponent was Me Tree Hospital.
She didn’t like that she had to leave Choo-ja behind, but she had no regrets. Since the
drug farm incident, she didn’t leave Kwon Chae-woo on the hospital bed. Lee-yeon had
prepped him for this day. So, he won’t have much trouble assisting her.
Lee-yeon stopped in her tracks. A familiar face in the Me Tree Hospital team made her
bite the insides of her lips.
Director Jo Kyung-cheon…
He was her former boss.
What was more troubling was his name was on the thug’s phone, who was maintaining
the drug farm. But the investigation became a farce and the only answer she received
whenever she visited the D hospital was that the director wasn’t there.
She had almost given up…
He approached her with a smile. “Lee-yeon.”
The first person to react to his voice was Kwon Chae-woo. He wrapped his arm around
her waist, protectively, and glared at the man. Jo Kyung-cheon looked away from him
after a while.
“I heard you’ve been looking for me?”
“What are you doing in Hwaido?” Lee-yeon lowered her voice and glared at him coldly.
“It better not be what I think it is.”
“Lee-yeon, I was the first to bring you here.”
She frowned at the random chatter. She knew what Jo Kyung-cheon was talking about.
He probably meant the time she came to Hwaido for a business trip not long after she
got hired at his tree hospital.
Jo Kyung-cheon stared impassively at Lee-yeon, who kept her mouth shut. He just
remembered the conversation he had with Executive Kwon.
“How is the plan coming along?”
“It’s going smoothly.”
“You should make sure no one finds out about that rare plant.”
“I’ll keep that in mind.”
If she didn’t find that plant, everything would have been better… Jo Kyung-cheon’s
face darkened. Seven years ago, something rare was discovered in a swamp at
Hwaido. During the training, Lee-yeon had taken a wrong turn into the swamp and Jo
Kyung-cheon had benefited from it.
It was a type of plant that wasn’t even known to the world yet. It had no name. But a
rumor of a rare plant started originating. There was an incident where it was uprooted
from its roots, and it suddenly disappeared. It was the Kwon family’s doing.
And a few years later, the researchers who studied the plant disappeared. He had
used Hwang Jo-yoon’s behavior as an excuse to kick So Lee-yeon out of the hospital.
He had no idea that she would settle in Hwaido.
Jo Kyung-cheon took a step forward towards her with mixed feelings. “Lee-yeon.”
“Stop there.” Kwon Chae-woo stopped him.
As the two men glared at each other, Lee-yeon bit her tongue in anticipation.
“This is my husband,” said Lee-yeon as a way of introduction.
“What?!” Jo Kyung-cheon was surprised. Director Jo felt that there were many flaws in
Lee-yeon from the time she worked in his hospital, so he was shocked to hear that she
was now wed.
“Lee-yeon, can’t you stop here?” Jo Kyung-cheon boldly asked her.
“Stop what?”
“Hwaidome.”
“Are you asking me to forfeit? Why should I?”
Jo Kyung-cheon realized that she didn’t know anything. As he walked past her, he
whispered, “You keep your mouth shut if you don’t want to die.”

Only Lee-yeon could hear him. But there was no way Kwon Chae-woo wouldn’t have
noticed with those sensitive ears of his.
He was about to lunge at the director when Lee-yeon hurriedly tugged at his sleeve.
She shook her head and Kwon Chae-woo frowned, but he calmed down.
Lee-yeon stared blankly at the spot where Jo Kyung-cheon had been standing. She
couldn’t tell if that was a threat or a warning.
The items that the Forest Service gave out were divided and distributed to the
hospitals. Two backpacks that held items for sleeping. A bag for diagnostic items,
tablet PC, supporting sticks for climbing mountains and other necessary items.
The system was simple. The picture taken by the tablet PC on the fully treated tree
was sent to the judge. This round was about speed. One must be able to quickly
diagnose and treat the tree.
“Kwon Chae-woo, we’re going now. Get ready.” Lee-yeon put on her backpack and
tapped at Kwon Chae-woo, who was busy reading the map. He didn’t even blink as he
checked every little mark on the map.
A small drone was flying over their head, and the timer on the tablet PC started. Leeyeon glanced at Me Tree Hospital and went in a different direction.
She didn’t look so joyful as she looked around the dark forest. There were so many
trees that were broken. Last year, the landslide had destroyed much of the mountain
terrain. The ground was full of rocks and tree barks. Their shoes turned muddy. They
felt like they were walking in an abandoned place. The weather was also murky.
“I think we have lots to do today.”

Lee-yeon tilted her head a little. Kwon Chae-woo stopped talking after they walked
into the forest. He looked serious and sensitive. Lee-yeon also became serious as he
looked different than usual.
“What is it?”

“Do you not feel well? Does your head hurt?”
Kwon Chae-woo smiled dryly. “You have always been curious about my head.”
“Pardon?”
“At the drug farm. When I was getting hit, do you remember what you said?”
She couldn’t remember everything clearly. She was running on adrenaline then.
Kwon Chae-woo playfully nudged her forehead. “You said not to ever hit me on my
head.”
He smiled. Lee-yeon looked down as she blushed.
She took a seat and started with the emergency treatment. The foremost thing Leeyeon did was to cut ruined branches and restore the balance of the trees. She did her
best connecting the broken branches and fastening them with steel. It was basically
like putting a cast on the tree.
After she was done treating, she quickly moved onto other trees like a chipmunk.
Kwon Chae-woo was busy giving her the tools she needed while also taking pictures.
“There are many trees that are already dead.”
Most of them were split in half or had drowned.
“A healthy tree blossoms in a short period and withers, but unhealthy trees have only
few leaves. Look at this. Most trees are like that right?”
There were many curved branches on trees that still had some flowers on it. But
looked sickly and were about to wither.
Kwon Chae-woo frowned as he listened to Lee-yeon.
“That’s a sad story.”
“Pardon?”
“They blossom but wither so fast.” He said morosely.
“The flower season is short,” Lee-yeon said casually, but Kwon Chae-woo was still
frowning.
“Then I’ll never give you a flower.”
“Why?”
“It’s a sign of a very short lifespan.”

Lee-yeon felt a prick in her heart. He understood the trees, but she did want flowers
from him even if it represented a short lifespan.
She just focused on connecting the yellow rubber tube. She was about to put the tube
into the holes when…

His face changed again.
Lee-yeon knew that expression too well.

“What’s wrong? Another wild boar?”
Lee-yeon stopped what she was doing and lowered her voice. But Kwon Chae-woo was
frowning and staring somewhere else. She was nervous.
Kwon Chae-woo looked at Lee-yeon.
“What?”
“I don’t know what that is, and what that sound means.”
Lee-yeon looked nervous so Kwon Chae-woo changed the subject. “Lee-yeon, do you
really want that Hwaidome project?”
“Uh…” She scratched her cheek. “Do you think others will laugh at how ridiculous it
sounds?”
“No. There’s no one that likes trees as much as you,” said Kwon Chae-woo gently. She
could see that he was still tense, and his fists were clenched.
He kept hearing a sound. It had started the moment they had entered the forest. The
sound came from random directions. It bothered him. He was on his guard, but his
face looked calm. He didn’t want to worry Lee-yeon. This project was her dream.
“Well out of everything, be it the contract or the money…”
Kwon Chae-woo raised his eyebrow at the sound again. A bird flew by.
Was it just wings flapping?
“I thought I would do well since you’re watching, Kwon Chae-woo.” Her soft voice
calmed his riled up senses.
“I really had nothing to say when I couldn’t be myself in front of Hwang Jo-yoon. I
thought that I shouldn’t delay it any longer as I saw you reacting to everything. So
that’s why I wanted to face it like an adult. Especially with the skills I have.”

Even though Kwon Chae-woo had extraordinary hearing, in that moment the world
had gone dead silent. He couldn’t hear anything. He took everything in. Her eyes, her
lips, her eyebrows…
“I was hoping you would find inner peace watching me work. It hasn’t been long since
you woke up, so I’ll do my best. I’ll buy you lots of nice things once I win the money.”
He was mesmerized by Lee-yeon’s innocently sparkling eyes.
“And I love treating sick trees.”
Her smile undid her, and he leaned down and kissed her. His fingers starved for her
skin. Her mouth was sweet on his. She tried to take a step back. He kissed her
frantically. She was out of breath. The forest was the worst place for a kiss with their
hands muddy and filthy. Even so, they kissed passionately, forgetting about the work
they must do. It was when the man couldn’t handle it anymore and grabbed Leeyeon’s breast that she pushed him away. He was already hard and Lee-yeon could feel
it on her lower abdomen.
As she whined like it hurt, and their lips finally parted. The first thing she saw was
Kwon Chae-woo’s bloodshot eyes and the vein popping on his forehead.
“We can’t do that here. We’re in the middle of a competition…”
“I know.”
They were both panting hard. They couldn’t take their eyes off each other’s lips.
“I-I have to tie the rest of the wire.”
“Okay.”
Lee-yeon went to work. Even though she just took only a few steps, the air was
different. The wind was refreshing. Her lips hurt like they were stung by a bee, and
she felt his gaze on her. She felt herself becoming hot, so she had to keep moving her
hands.
She first wrapped a long wire on one side and tied another tree that looked like it was
about to fall. Then she pulled the healthy tree’s wire tightly. Her face became stiff.
“What’s wrong?” Kwon Chae-woo pulled her hands off the wire. Lee-yeon blushed.
Lee-yeon felt a little embarrassed at the man who was looking into her eyes so
intensely. “This will hurt a lot for the tree.”
Kwon Chae-woo stared at the tree that was sustaining its life with just one wire
attached to another. He smiled.
“Why are you smiling?” asked Lee-yeon.
“That’s me,” he said.
“Huh?”
“I’m that tree that’s about to fall.” He gestured to the tree which was about to die.
“But why do you feel bad for the healthy tree, Lee-yeon?”
“Well, because it’ll become a support for the other tree for the rest of its life. This wire
will hurt it a lot. It’ll dig into its bark and leave a scar.”
“Poor tree.”
It sounded a little sarcastic. As Lee-yeon frowned, Kwon Chae-woo pointed at the
wounded tree. “I feel like that one is laughing. It’s enjoying itself. It likes that it can
look at this beautiful tree for the rest of its life.”

Lee-yeon couldn’t say anything to that. She stared at the two trees that she had tied
together and still couldn’t come to the same conclusion as Kwon Chae-woo. She just
brushed off her arms and began packing her tools.
And that moment, Kwon Chae-woo suddenly pulled at her wrist. “Kwon Chae-woo!”
She almost lost her balance, but he dragged her with him. He started to run, pulling
her with him. Her wrist hurt from his grip. She was running with him now. It was hard
to match his pace.
Her legs hurt and she was panting hard. Kwon Chae-woo knew Lee-yeon was
struggling but he neither looked back at her nor slowed down. He was grabbing her
wrist for dear life. She got cramps from running so hard.
“The treatment bag! We can’t leave that—”
“Run as hard as you can!” His voice cracked.
Lee-yeon’s heart dropped as she saw his face stiffen. Kwon Chae-woo was carrying
both of their backpacks and kept dragging her along with him.
The ground shook.
“Uh… What?!”
A faint vibration accompanied the unfamiliar sound. She turned around to look
instinctively.
“What—“
The mountain was collapsing.
Was it because of pouring rain the last couple of days? A huge amount of mud and
rocks were coming down in a landslide. No matter where she looked, there was
nowhere to escape. The top of the tree wasn’t safe either. The trees were already so
weak that they wouldn’t be able to handle their weights.
Last year, the landslide had almost covered the whole town. Lee-yeon screamed. She
couldn’t run anymore. Kwon Chae-woo lifted her up and carried her on his shoulders.

What she saw was terrifying! The swamp was overflowing. The wave that was
swallowing the forest was quickly approaching them as though it intended to swallow
them too.
Kwon Chae-woo,” she called out softly. She could feel herself growing weaker as the
words tumbled out of her mouth. She couldn’t believe she was witnessing the
landslide in person.
All the trees in the surroundings broke and began to lose their shape. The stone wall
was built to stop the landslide from coming in from both sides, but it didn’t stop the
horrors that lay beyond.
“Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo said, panting as he came to her. He had grown tired from
having to carry Lee-yeon and all their belongings. “Listen carefully.”
Lee-yeon watched him with panicked eyes, hanging onto his every word.
“If you go left from here,” Kwon Chae-woo continued as he caught his breath, “there
should be a small cave where you can take cover.” He tried his best to piece together
his memory of the map he had painstakingly tried to memorize.
He had learned that, in the past, Hwaido had been used as a military base. People had
built caves all over it for all sorts of reasons, so they were in abundance here.
Distracted by his thoughts, Kwon Chae-woo nearly tripped on a rock. He could feel
himself losing his balance until he managed to find stable ground. He moved his grip
around Lee-yeon between her legs to make sure he didn’t drop her.
“The cave,” he said, picking up his last thought, “it’s narrow. You should be able to fit
in there.” His voice could barely be heard as his breath quickened from exhaustion.
“Get in the cave, block it with a bag, and hold.”
Lee-yeon stared at him, blinking. She didn’t understand what he meant and all she
could do was look at him with a worried expression.
As she ran through what Kwon Chae-woo had said in her head, she felt her mouth dry
and her heart sink. His words had bothered her. She grabbed his clothes tightly, her
grip growing fierce by the minute. Around them, the trees continued to break.
“What about you, Kwon Chae-woo?” she demanded.
The man simply panted. His breath was shallow.
When she realized what he meant with his plan, Lee-yeon’s eyes widened. She looked
at Kwon Chae-woo pleadingly, as if she was asking him to give her an answer. When
he refused to speak, she shook her head.
“I’m not going alone!” she exclaimed.
Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes flicked to hers. He looked away. “Please,” he said. “Just listen
to me.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes grew hard. She thrashed against him. “No!”
“So Lee-yeon!” Kwon Chae-woo said loudly. His harsh tone forced Lee-yeon into
silence. “Keep it together,” he told her. “Do you want to die here?”
His words dripped with anger. There was no warmth to his tone, only the harsh reality
of the situation that they were in.
Lee-yeon froze. She knew why he was making her do this. Her head understood, but
her heart simply refused to give into reality. She shook her head again. “No,” she said
quietly. “But still… I can’t go alone.”
Her grip on him was tight enough to leave bruises on both of them. Her expression
remained as she glared at him defiantly.
The ground shook as the landslide rolled towards them. Kwon Chae-woo moved to let
Lee-yeon go and take cover, but she thrashed and screamed at him.
“You can’t make me do this!” she yelled. Her voice was shrill as she strained to speak
louder than the chaos around them. “I can’t do this alone!”
“Don’t be a fool!” Kwon Chae-woo shouted back. He was desperate now, watching as
the trees beyond them slowly began to disappear. “Who are you to stop me from
saving my wife?” He was not going to bend on this. He would force her to leave, no
matter what it took.
Lee-yeon despaired. She believed that Kwon Chae-woo was being deeply selfish and
unfair, even more unfair than the landslide that was destroying everything around
them. She could feel her heart pound against her chest as she wept.
“Please, don’t do this, Kwon Chae-woo. Please don’t,” she begged, hoping that he
would hear her. “You said that you would listen to me! You said that you would do
whatever I told you to. You promised! So why are you making me do this? Why are you
always like this?”
Why is all this so easy for you? she wondered. Why is it so easy for you to accept me?
Why was it so hard for me to accept you?
The ground was coming up closer to them now. Lee-yeon watched as mud began to
bury Kwon Chae-woo’s feet and pull her away from him. She could feel herself
beginning to drift farther away.
“Don’t let go!” she shouted.
Kwon Chae-woo could feel his exhaustion slip away as Lee-yeon only grew more
insistent. Even during a landslide, now of all times, she was determined to keep him
by her side.
You can’t leave me here! He could only imagine the way her mind was working. I don’t
want to stay in a scary place by myself!
Lee-yeon grabbed him by the arm and tried to hold him close. But the force pushed
them away and, no matter how many times she tried to take hold, he would just move
to make her let go. Despite this, she was persistent. She latched on tightly, even
scratching his skin as she did.
Roughly pulling himself away from her, Kwon Chae-woo threw Lee-yeon and the
backpacks to the ground. He pushed her into the cave and stacked the two backpacks
at the entrance, ignoring her protests. “Hold on tight!”
Lee-yeon was livid. “Kwon Chae-woo!”
“We could have done so much more,” she could hear him say outside the cave. “So, if
you die in a place like this, I’ll kill you again.”
Lee-yeon listened to his words, eyes welling with tears. They weren’t the words of a
man saying goodbye. They were unwavering and present. They were alive.
But then the landslide swallowed him whole and Lee-yeon could do nothing. She could
feel the connection between the two of them physically untether.
“Kwon Chae-woo!” she cried. Her screams echoed in the cave. Dirt began to seep
through the spaces between the two bags and Lee-yeon was afraid that she would end
up getting swept away too.
She held on for dear life.
The bags shook and her arms ached as she pushed them. She held on until her bones
hurt, but it was just impossible to block it all. Her clothes were splattered with mud as
the force of the landslide continued to push against her.
It was all happening so quickly. She had no clue what was happening, and it all hit her
so fast.
Kwon Chae-woo was gone. He was just gone.
The world was collapsing around her.
But then, miraculously, the landslide stopped.
The mud was already up to her waist, but the force had stopped. Her clothes were
soaked and her lips had gone blue from the cold. Her whole body ached.
She leaned against the wall and let out a sob. She buried her face in her hands and
cried.
“Kwon Chae-woo,” she called out softly. “Are you out there? Chae-woo? Are you out
there?”
No reply came, only the silence of the cave accompanied her here.
After a moment, Lee-yeon tried to pull herself together. She wiped the tears from her
eyes and pushed herself from the wall. Her back hurt terribly and the cold was
beginning to come through the entrance.
She found the backpack that had been buried in the mud. She pulled it up and found
the tablet PC that sat in the front pocket. She grabbed it and hurriedly turned it on.
The screen flashed and, in the dim light, she saw that there was no Wi-Fi here. But
that wasn’t what caught her attention. What caught her attention was the wallpaper of
the tablet.
It was a picture of her treating the trees. Kwon Chae-woo must’ve taken it.
Lee-yeon felt a lump in her throat form as she let out a cry. He had told her he would
kill her if she died here.
That bastard, she thought. I should have been the one to tell him that.
She closed her eyes for a long time as her pain washed over her. When she finally
opened them, she was determined.
She would find him.
In all this chaos, I will find you.

She knew that she wouldn’t be safe if she just waited here in fear. Even now, the mud
was still slowly trickling into the cave. Her face became hard as the mud reached her
waist and then, eventually, caught up to her collarbones.
She had to get out.
Even if she was hurt, she wanted to be close to him.
She pushed the bag away and, as she did, water came in and went up to her chin. She
let out a startled sound when it first rushed towards her.
Taking a deep breath, she closed her eyes and dove into the muddy water. Small
pieces of debris rubbed against her face and her skin stung like salt being rubbed over
an open wound.
When she emerged, she looked like a soldier in camouflage, completely covered in
mud.
As she looked around, she began to pale. She figured that the mud would have messed
with the forest, but she couldn’t have imagined the carnage that she faced as she
stepped forward. All the trees she could see had been destroyed.
“Kwon Chae-woo!” she called out. She shouted from the top of her lungs, but no reply
came.
He was nowhere to be seen. Lee-yeon couldn’t tell where he had been swept off to or
where he could have been buried. So she kept moving forward in hopes of finding
where he was.
She continued to call him, “Kwon Chae-woo!” As she waded through the mud, it felt
like she was being weighed down by two tires, pulling her away from where she
wanted to go. Her body began to give, but it was nothing compared to the despair she
felt inside.
As she shouted for Kwon Chae-woo again, lightning flashed in the distance. She knew
that it was a cloudy day but, as rain began to pour, she felt her mouth dry.
Then, at that very moment, she saw a drone flying up in the sky. She waved her arms
around and called out. “Here!” she shouted. “I’m here!”
It had been a big landslide. A disaster management team would be moving quickly to
deal with the aftermath. Soon, a rescue team would come and save her. Her throat
tightened as she imagined being rescued without having found Kwon Chae-woo first.
She needed to find him quickly.
She continued pushing through the mud, sliding and nearly falling as she went
forward. Her arms strained as she used them to get through the mud and her clothes,
now soaked in mud, only seemed to weigh her down more with every step she took.
Where could Kwon Chae-woo be?
Her lips trembled as she began to hopelessness. She closed her eyes and took a deep
breath. She could already feel the tears coming, but she didn’t want to cry yet.
As she opened her eyes to keep going, she saw it: a body caught between the trees.
With all her energy, Lee-yeon started to run, but her body eventually gave in and she
had to stop. Crying, she shouted, “Kwon Chae-woo!”
The state he was in was not much different from Lee-yeon’s. His face was covered in
mud and she could barely see his face.
She pushed herself towards him and managed to reach him after struggling. She took
a rope from her bag and wrapped it around Kwon Chae-woo’s waist. She flipped him
over carefully and felt her heart stop when she finally saw that his eyes were closed.
He didn’t move. Kwon Chae-woo was still and Lee-yeon almost believed he was dead.
There was blood on his forehead and she thought it must have been ripped by a rock.
Lee-yeon trembled as she leaned down and pressed her head against his chest.
“Kwon Chae-woo?” she said quietly. “Can you hear me?”
She was mostly just talking to herself, but she couldn’t stand not talking to him. She
reached her hand to his neck and checked his pulse. She let out a sigh, she didn’t
know if it was out of relief or resentment.
“Please,” she whispered. “Please stay with me.”
She turned his head and took out what dirt she could from his mouth. She had never
had an interest in saving other people’s lives, but, at that moment, she regretted only
knowing how to take care of trees.
She clenched her teeth. She wouldn’t stop until he woke up.
As she searched for a blanket to cover him, she saw his eyes flicker open. She rushed
over to him and held him. His eyes opened and met hers.
Her eyes filled with tears. At that moment, she felt nothing but gratitude. His decision
to save her had scared her and she knew that she didn’t want to be alone like that
again.
“I think I know now,” she said softly. “The two trees I wrapped with wire—they may
have been strange, but I know now. They just wanted to feel each other’s warmth.”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. His eyes seemed far away and unfamiliar to her. He seemed
different, completely different. Lee-yeon wondered if it was because he was in pain. Maybe it was just because he was uncomfortable.
Then, in a husky voice he asked, “Who are you?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened.
Kwon Chae-woo looked around. “Fuck,” he said. “What is going on here?”
Lee-yeon froze as Kwon Chae-woo looked around the forest and swore at everything
he saw. His voice was cold and his gaze was focused on everything but Lee-yeon.
He staggered up to his feet then grabbed his arm and hissed.
“Are you hurt?” Lee-yeon asked, standing up beside him. “Are you okay?”
She moved her hand to touch him, but she slapped it away.
“Don’t touch me,” he said.
His eyes were glazed over, almost like he was drugged. He took his shoulder and
popped it back in roughly. Lee-yeon shrank into herself as she watched him become
the person he was before.
He looked down at her and clicked his tongue, groaning as pain shot through his body.
Lee-yeon was still. She was in shock after everything that happened. Then he grabbed
her arm.
“What is all of this?” he demanded. “Who are you? Why am I here?”
Lee-yeon was quiet as he continued to ramble and look around frantically. She refused
to face the reality that she knew was there. It hurt more than everything she had gone
through during the landslide.
“I’m asking you,” Kwon Chae-woo said harshly. “Who are you?”
Without thinking, Lee-yeon stepped forward and hit Kwon Chae-woo in the head.
He grabbed at the side of his head that she hit and turned to her, glaring. “Do you
want to die?”
Panicking, Lee-yeon backed away from him. “No,” she shook her head. “It’s not that.”
“What are you doing?”
Lee-yeon swallowed. “Just faint again.”
“What?” Kwon Chae-woo looked bewildered.
“This isn’t right!” Lee-yeon exclaimed. “This isn’t right.”
Everything was a mess now.
Lee-yeon could feel goosebumps all over her body as she held back a scream. “No, this
can’t be!” she exclaimed. She was beginning to see the reality of the situation, but she
refused to believe it. It wasn’t right.
Kwon Chae-woo pressed a hand to his head and held it as if he had a headache. “What
the fuck?” he grumbled. He looked like he was about to pass out. He kept moving his
head like he was trying to clear something from his vision but couldn’t.
“Just rest and calm down,” Lee-yeon told him. “You aren’t yourself right now. This
isn’t right. This isn’t you. It just can’t be.” She bit her nails anxiously and tasted the
dirt that had gathered underneath.
Kwon Chae-woo paled as he turned to face her. Lee-yeon could hear him mumbling
under his breath. “You…” he groaned as his eyes began to close. Lee-yeon reached out
to cover his eyes and he slowly began to succumb to sleep. He flitted in and out of
consciousness for a moment before falling asleep completely.
His knees buckled as they gave in, and he collapsed into Lee-yeon’s arms. She tried
her best to hold him up and keep him from hitting his head on anything as he fell.
“We’ll meet again,” she whispered to him in a trembling voice. “We’ll meet again, and
you’ll go back to being my husband.”

A rescue team arrived not long after that and they managed to make the situation
easier to deal with. When Lee-yeon heard their helicopter and saw the orange vests
wade through the mud, she expected to feel relieved. But she felt nothing.
As they placed her on a stretcher and brought her to the bottom of the mountain, her
mind was completely blank.
The second tournament had been canceled because of the landslide but, luckily, there
were no casualties. The Forest Agency was busy handling the situation and most of
the members were running around to make sure that everything was okay.
Lee-yeon could do nothing but watch Kwon Chae-woo and feel herself fall into despair.
A member of the rescue team opened the ambulance door for Lee-yeon and asked her,
“Are you coming?”
Even if she knew that she should, Lee-yeon couldn’t seem to get her body to move.
She simply stood there, covered in mud, as the rescue member walked to her with a
worried look.
“Are you okay?” he asked.
Lee-yeon didn’t know how to answer. Her mind was racing and yet it was also
completely still. What had just happened? What went wrong?
She remembered Kwon Chae-woo’s voice when he had asked her who she was. It was
cold and sharp. He seemed distant, like he didn’t know who she was at all. He wasn’t
the man that she knew he was.
The way he had looked at her made her feel like she was falling off a cliff. It crushed
her. He had looked at her as if she was nothing to him and it had hurt her more than
she could ever imagine. She couldn’t find it in herself to get into the ambulance out of
fear that he would look at her like that again.
Maybe she had grown too familiar with the way he loved her, the way he seemed to
worship her. The way he had looked at her was a splash of cold water in the face of
the marriage they had both held dear.
The voice of the rescue team member snapped her out of her thoughts. “Hello?”
“Oh, sorry! Yes, of course,” Lee-yeon said as she stepped into the ambulance and sat
down beside her unconscious husband.
She was in charge of keeping him safe. Although she didn’t feel ready for that
responsibility, she knew that it was one she would have to accept. She wanted him
back so that she could get to know the parts of him that were yet to be discovered.
She wanted him back because she valued the love he had given so much.
“Please come back,” she said to him quietly. “Kwon Chae-woo, please come back to
me.”
The door of the ambulance closed.

“There’s nothing wrong with him,” the doctor said. “His wound will heal and he will
regain his consciousness soon.”
Lee-yeon nodded as she glanced at Kwon Chae-woo’s body on the hospital bed. “Thank
you,” she told the doctor.
He nodded at her and left her alone in the room with her husband’s sleeping body. As
soon as he was gone, Lee-yeon collapsed onto the floor.
When they arrived at the hospital, the doctor had taken Kwon Chae-woo to the
mortuary. As he was in a vegetative state, they needed to have him washed and
handled carefully.
While they examined him, they showed Lee-yeon to the VIP room to take a shower and
wash away all the dirt on her body. She threw her muddy clothes away and changed
into a hospital gown. When she was done, she found Kwon Chae-woo lying perfectly
still on his bed.
What will happen if I approach him? Lee-yeon wondered to herself.
She sat on the sofa across the room from the bed and dried her hair with a towel.
Although she knew he was still unconscious, she couldn’t help herself from glancing at
Kwon Chae-woo to see if anything had changed.
She could see his face now. He was no longer covered in mud and looked much better
than he had looked when she found him in the wreckage earlier.
Unable to keep still, Lee-yeon kept pacing towards the bed, away from it, and all
around the room. She just watched him, hoping that he would finally wake up.
After a few hours, she heard the blanket move. She looked at the bed, frozen as Kwon
Chae-woo’s eyes began to open. They were already in the hospital, but she felt like she
was stuck in the mud all over again. She was just as frightened as she had been in the
forest.
She held her breath as they locked eyes. She gripped the bed frame as he stared at
her wordlessly. His eyes went over her body, looking at her from head to toe. The
silence was suffocating.
Finally, Kwon Chae-woo spoke. “Come here,” he said gently.
Lee-yeon didn’t move. She just continued to look at him with wide, unsure eyes.
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. “Why are you standing so far away?” he asked, moving his
eyes to indicate the distance between the two of them. “You’re acting like you don’t
know me.”
Still, Lee-yeon didn’t move.
“Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo said sadly.
At the sound of her name, tears began to fall from Lee-yeon’s eyes. She buried her
face in her hands as she began to sob.
Kwon Chae-woo got out of his bed at once. He winced a little as pain shot through his
body, but he ignored it as he pulled his wife into his arms.
“Lee-yeon,” he said again.
She broke into another wave of sobs. Just the sound of him calling her name was
enough to break her. “It’s really you, right?” she asked. “You’re Kwon Chae-woo.
You’re my husband, right?” When she looked up at him, she found him staring at her
with that adoring look that she knew all too well.
“You’re Kwon Chae-woo, the man who can hunt a wild boar, hit people well, and use a
knife, right?” she asked. “You’re the man who packs great picnic baskets, brings
flowers, and sucks on the flowers with me, right?”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her tenderly and stared right into her eyes. “If I’m not your
husband, then who am I?” He was frowning as if the very thought of not being her
husband was an offense on his character. “Lee-yeon, have you ever sucked on a flower
with someone other than me?”
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened at his question. “What?” she asked in shock. “Of course not.”
“Then why are you acting as if you have?” he asked. There was jealousy in his eyes.
Lee-yeon was taken aback by his question. You acted like you didn’t know me, she
wanted to say. But she kept it in. Instead, she said, “I was so worried that you were
gone.” She rubbed her eyes until they felt raw.
Everything that had happened continued to flood her mind. She remembered Kwon
Chae-woo shoving her into the cave and leaving her alone. She remembered finding
him unconscious in the midst of all the mud and debris. She remembered him
speaking to her in his real voice.
Except that wasn’t his real voice. His real voice was no longer that of Kwon Chae-woo,
the killer. His real voice was that of Kwon Chae-woo, the man that held her tightly and
refused to let her go. This was his real voice. This was who he really was.
“I thought I lost you,” she said as she continued to cry. “I thought that it was really the
end.” She gripped Kwon Chae-woo’s sleeves harshly. “No matter what happens, I
don’t care what you want, you will never leave me like that again.”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. He pulled Lee-yeon closer and held her tight. She looked so
small and cold, he just wanted her to feel safe and warm again. He hated seeing her
like this.
“Lee-yeon,” he said, his voice low. “I will do the same thing if that ever happens again.
I will always save you first.”
At his words, Lee-yeon tried to be free from his grasp. She pulled and squirmed as she
attempted to push him off. He just pressed her closer to his chest.
“I’m sorry,” he said like he was truly pleading for her forgiveness. “You are the only
thing that I want to save. You have to let me.” As Lee-yeon struggled against him, he
simply rubbed her back. “I can’t give you what you want.”
“Kwon Chae-woo,” Lee-yeon cried, finally standing still. “Take your clothes off and
hold me.

His breath caught in his throat.
Lee-yeon looked up to see him staring off. There was a silence between them and,
eventually, Kwon Chae-woo broke it by licking his lips nervously. Lee-yeon just held
her breath and stared at him, waiting for an answer.
“Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo finally said. “Were you hurt?”
She didn’t answer. Whatever suggestive comment she had made seemed to be pushed
to the side by his question. He was changing the subject. He even took a step back to
put some distance between the two of them.
“Does it hurt here?” he asked, his hand coming close to her stomach but stopping
before he could touch it. He remembered pushing her stomach when he kicked the
backpack off.
“It’s fine,” Lee-yeon said as she glared at Kwon Chae-woo uncharacteristically. It had
taken her all her courage to voice out her request and he had completely ignored her.
She was embarrassed but, above all, she felt extremely challenged. In a quiet but firm
voice she said, “Don’t get a job.”
Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t help but scratch his head at all. Lee-yeon’s unpredictability
had thrown him off. “You don’t like your husband earning money?” he asked.
“You keep hurting yourself to save me,” Lee-yeon said, ignoring his question.
He couldn’t help but laugh. “I think I should be telling you to not work,” he said. “I
may not be a famous tree doctor, but I can’t earn enough to not let you starve.” He
didn’t understand the innocent intentions behind her words and it made him restless,
forcing him to close his eyes and place his hands behind his head listlessly. “Lee-yeon,
don’t make me an incompetent man,” he said, but his voice was too soft for her to
hear.
When he calmed down, he opened his eyes and looked at her. “We need to look
ahead,” he told her. “I need a job so that we can manage our lives moving forward.”
Lee-yeon frowned. She lowered her head and held Kwon Chae-woo’s sleeve weakly.
“Even if I whine?”
“Whine?”
“Like if I said that you really, really don’t have to work and ask you to just stay home?”
Kwon Chae-woo narrowed his eyes.
“Will you really have to go out even if I whine?” Lee-yeon asked him. “This is the third
request I’ve asked of you, will you not let me get what I want?”
Kwon Chae-woo stared at Lee-yeon as she played with his sleeve. It was similar to the
way she was in the beginning, when she was frightened of him, but it was also
different in some way. She was still afraid, but, this time, she wasn’t afraid of him.
Instead of pushing him away, she wanted him closer to her.
He realized it was over for him now. She had ignited a fire within him that even he
couldn’t put out.
“Are you nagging me?” he asked. “You want me to listen to my wife? Is that it?”
Although he tried his hardest, he couldn’t hide the laughter that was bubbling beneath
his words. “Why do you want me to be at home all the time? So you can bang me?”
Lee-yeon was startled at how quickly the tone had shifted. “Sorry?”
Kwon Chae-woo shrugged. “I could be going around and hunting wild animals, but you
want me to stay home,” he said. “If that’s really what you want, then you’ll need to
perform.”
Lee-yeon looked at him, then, hesitantly, she asked, “How many times do you want it
then?”
“I don’t care about numbers,” he said. “I just want to have you every night.”
Lee-yeon blinked. “Kwon Chae-woo, there’s a reason why people only work five days a
week,” she tried to explain. “People aren’t meant to overwork themselves.”
“So, you want to lock me up at home, but you can’t even let me have that?” Kwon
Chae-woo asked. “That hardly seems fair, Lee-yeon.”
She looked away and avoided his gaze. She glanced at the door of the hospital room.
Kwon Chae-woo walked over to the door and locked it. “Now,” he said in a warning
tone. “Tell me if you’re hurt.”
As the tone shifted, the words he had used to change the subject earlier took on a
different meaning. Her heart started racing as Kwon Chae-woo sat on the bed and
tapped his thigh.
“Come here,” he said. He began to remove his hospital gown. There was a bandage
over his shoulder that drew Lee-yeon’s focus on his hard abs. Lee-yeon blushed as she
hesitantly stepped forward.
As she sat on his thigh, Kwon Chae-woo pulled her roughly by the waist. She could
feel his hard cock press against her side. “It was like this since you asked me to hold
you,” he whispered into her ear.
Lee-yeon turned to meet his eyes. Kwon Chae-woo just smirked.
“I got turned on when I saw you wearing that hospital gown,” he said. “They look a lot
like your pajamas.” His voice lowered as he leaned in closer. “I held back because I
thought that, if we had sex in the hospital, you wouldn’t be able to make a proper
sound.”
Lee-yeon swallowed. “You don’t know anything.” With that, she took his face into her
hands and crashed her lips into his. Kwon Chae-woo was stunned at the sudden action
but, as her smell began to fill his senses, he relaxed into the kiss.
She bit his lower lip just like Kwon Chae-woo usually did. He flinched at the unfamiliar
sensation. He let out a breath and pulled her in closer, his grip on her waist becoming
firm. He opened his lips and her tongue pushed against his wildly.
He let out a moan as he felt her hot breath against his skin, then continued to kiss her
like it was all that mattered.
Lee-yeon’s back curved and she was pulled against Kwon Chae-woo. She was on cloud
nine.
Kwon Chae-woo grabbed her thighs and pulled her closer to his cock. Every time they
pulled away from the kiss for air, a wet, sloppy sound filled the room. Eventually,
Kwon Chae-woo moved his lips away from Lee-yeon’s and began to suck on her
earlobes. A shiver ran through her spine as his lips lowered to her neck and bit into
her skin.
Lee-yeon let out a moan as she felt heat begin to build between her legs. She felt him
reach under her shirt, then, suddenly, he froze.
“Where’s your bra?” he growled.
Lee-yeon whined at the loss of contact and pulled back to look at Kwon Chae-woo. “I
don’t have any spares…”
“And your underwear?”

Kwon Chae-woo wrapped his tongue around Lee-yeon’s swollen nipple and sucked on
it, groaning against her skin as he did. Every now and then, he would stop to flick it,
and her toes would curl as she let out a moan.
The more contact he had with her nipple, the harder it seemed to become, and the
more he continued to suck on it. He squeezed her breasts as his lips worked against
her skin and Lee-yeon couldn’t help the sinful sounds that slipped from her lips.
Finally, Kwon Chae-woo pulled away. “Sit on my face,” he said.
Her mind hazy from pleasure, Lee-yeon looked at him with clouded eyes. “What?”
“Here,” Kwon Chae-woo said as he tapped on his lips. He leaned back and lay down on
the bed, pulling her thighs towards him as he did.
Still lost in her thoughts, Lee-yeon didn’t even realize what he was doing until he tried
to pull her close. “Wait!” she said. “What are you doing?”
“I need to suck you properly,” he told her.
Lee-yeon’s eyes widened. “Isn’t that a little much?”
Ignoring her protests, Kwon Chae-woo began to pull her closer. “Come up here, Leeyeon,” he said as he aggressively began to undress her and pull her thighs over his
head.
Frantically, Lee-yeon held onto the headboard to try to keep her balance. A blush
spread across her cheeks when she realized that she was now completely naked.
“Lee-yeon, you’re so pretty,” Kwon Chae-woo told her innocently, as if his face wasn’t
right in front of her heat. He could see her struggling to keep herself up and away
from him and his eyes became darker. For her sake, he tried to hide his smile when he
realized how naughty the position that they were in was.
But he eventually lost his patience and decided to take matters into his own hands.
Roughly, he pushed Lee-yeon’s thighs down so that she was exactly where he wanted
her.
Lee-yeon let out sounds of pleasure as Kwon Chae-woo began to nibble on the insides
of her thighs. Then, he stuck his tongue out and licked a stripe of her pussy.
“Oh!” Lee-yeon exclaimed, her thighs beginning to tremble. She gripped the
headboard with all her might.
As he continued to lick and kiss her growing heat, Kwon Chae-woo could feel her
tender flesh pulsing which just made the experience more stimulating. Eventually, he
pushed his tongue inside her and Lee-yeon let out a moan. She squirmed as he began
to suck on her clit.
Lee-yeon’s arms were shaking now as moans continued to pour out of her mouth.
Kwon Chae-woo kept playing with her hole, sucking it and licking it, as he squeezed
her thigh tightly. The more Lee-yeon tried to squirm out of his grasp, the tighter his
grip became.
The sounds coming from Kwon Chae-woo were dirty as he slurped and licked at her
witness. He would stick his tongue out and rub it against the spot inside her that
brought her that made her back arch.
Lee-yeon could feel the heat between her legs start to grow as he touched her where
she was most sensitive. If she wasn’t so dazed by the pleasure of it, she would have
been embarrassed by the sounds coming from both of them.
Then, Kwon Chae-woo lifted Lee-yeon up and changed their positions so that she lay
beneath him. He pulled down his pants and quickly tugged his underwear away. His
cock slapped against his stomach and he frowned as he saw the pre-cum dripping
from the tip.
“Lee-yeon, is it true that the flower is the plant’s reproductive organ?” he asked.
Lee-yeon nodded, her eyebrows furrowed as she was unsure of where he was going
with his. “Yes, that’s right.”
Kwon Chae-woo smirked down at her. “Then I don’t need another flower.”
He spread her legs and brushed his hardness against skin. Lee-yeon moaned as it
touched her sensitive clit. Then, out of nowhere, Kwon Chae-woo thrust sharply into
her.
They both moaned at the action. Lee-yeon could feel her body tingling with pleasure
and pain. She reached down to try and soothe herself, but Kwon Chae-woo beat her to
it and began to rub her side gently.
“A condom,” Lee-yeon suddenly said, eyes shooting open. “Kwon Chae-woo, you’re not
wearing a condom!”
Kwon Chae-woo watched her panic with a smile. “Why should I wear one?” he asked
as he rubbed her clit. Her head rolled back in pleasure. “Do I not deserve to be a
dad?” Lee-yeon’s hips moved against him instinctively.
She tried to speak, but her words were swallowed by her groans.
“Why aren’t you answering, huh?” Kwon Chae-woo teased her, continuing his attack
on her clit. “Well, it doesn’t matter anyway. I’ll still be a dad even if you keep your
mouth shut.”
When she didn’t answer again, he scoffed and started to pull out of her. As she felt
herself start to grow empty, Lee-yeon felt a chill run through her spine.
“I’m sorry,” Kwon Chae-woo whispered before plunging right back into her in one
swift movement. She let out a scream as he thrust in and out of her wildly. “I have no
intention of giving up on anything.”

Lee-yeon could feel the knot in her stomach become tighter. Her mind felt blank. She
would have thought she was drifting off into space if Kwon Chae-woo hadn’t leaned
down right in front of her face. Her hand came up to caress his face.
“You’re really Kwon Chae-woo, right?” she asked. He nuzzled into her palm and she
relaxed. “You really came back, right?”
Kwon Chae-woo could tell that Lee-yeon was talking more to herself than anything. He
would have been upset if her soft eyes weren’t staring right up at him and her hand
wasn’t holding his face.
“More,” she whined. “Chae-woo, more please.”
Obliging, Kwon Chae-woo moved faster and deeper.
Between her moans, Lee-yeon said, “I won’t come like last time. Tonight, we’ll go for
as long as we can.”
Kwon Chae-woo narrowed his eyes. “Stop talking,” he told her. “If you don’t stop
talking, I’ll come in your mouth.”
He was pounding his cock in and out of her mercilessly. It was rushed and primal, the
hospital room becoming hot from all their panting. As Lee-yeon tried to bite back a
moan with her lips, Kwon Chae-woo kissed her deeply, swallowing her sounds. He felt
himself grow harder.
“Do you like it when I pull out?” he asked her, his breath hot on her ear. He watched
her reaction as he slowly pulled out of her and quickly thrust back inside. Every time
he shoved his cock in, he could see her tremble and squirm. It felt like he was playing
a game and he had just managed to make a critical hit.
Lee-yeon writhed in pleasure as his thrusts became deeper and harder. She was
growing wet with every little thing that he did and that only made Kwon Chae-woo
pump into her faster. She liked feeling his thighs slap against her own and the loud,
wet sounds they made when they collided.
“I don’t know why you’re trying to turn me on,” Kwon Chae-woo groaned. He looked
down at where the two of them connected and nearly drooled at the sight of her juices
coating his length. “You don’t get anything out of it.”
Suddenly, he pulled out of Lee-yeon. Before she could even react, he had already
flipped her over. He lifted her hips and pushed into her from behind. She was moaning
loudly before she could even react to the primal position that they were in.
He was reaching deeper inside of her in the new position. She could feel the pleasure
build in her head. The more he moved, the more she felt like crying. With one
powerful thrust, his tip slammed against her cervix and Lee-yeon fell forward, her face
buried in the pillows as she let out cries of pleasure.
Continuing his punishing pace, Kwon Chae-woo grabbed Lee-yeon’s hips tight enough
to bruise them. He pulled her against him and, as he bottomed out, he leaned down to
her ear and asked, “Lee-yeon, is this how I do it?”
Lee-yeon buried her face in the pillow and let the moans spill from her lips freely. He
wasn’t just mindlessly shoving his cock into her; he was making calculated moves. He
would pull her to him and move his waist so that he could move within her before
continuing his brutal assault on her pussy. Lee-yeon was crying at the amount of
power and control that her husband was displaying.
Then, she felt the knot within her break. Her whole body shook as an orgasm took
over her. Kwon Chae-woo gritted his teeth when she tightened around him and soaked
him in her juices.
Despite her mind-numbing orgasm though, Kwon Chae-woo was still thrusting into
Lee-yeon hastily. She didn’t even have the chance to catch her breath and she was
already being shoved back into the bed. “Chae-woo!” she exclaimed, hoping that he
would give her a break.
She felt his cock slip out of her and she heard him rub himself until she felt a hotness
spread across her back. She didn’t even have to look to know what it was.
Lee-yeon collapsed onto the bed and let her body press all its weight into the
mattress. She could hear Kwon Chae-woo swear under his breath as he grabbed a
towel and wiped her back. Then, he flipped her over.
They lay there for a moment in silence before looking to see one another clearly.
For someone who had just had an orgasm, Kwon Chae-woo looked eerily calm. Even as
he panted loudly, his eyes were solemn as they looked at Lee-yeon.
Unable to control herself, Lee-yeon looked at his sculpted form. She inhaled and she
could smell his musk deeply. The smell of his sweat as the fucked was intoxicating,
she could feel herself melt from just that.
All of a sudden, Kwon Chae-woo spread Lee-yeon’s legs and, abruptly, he shoved his
cock back into her. From someone who had just come, he was still shockingly rigid.

Lee-yeon yelped in surprise at the suddenness of the action. There was no pain this
time, though, just pure bliss as Kwon Chae-woo started to thrust into her. He pulled
her into a deep kiss to soften her moans and Lee-yeon felt like she was losing her mind
every time he plunged into her.
The only thing she could think of was how hard and aggressive he was being and just
how sensitive she was becoming with his every touch.
The first night they had spent together, she had wondered how she was able to take
all of him. She felt so connected to him when they engaged in such primal activities.
“What are you staring at?” Kwon Chae-woo asked her. His voice was soft, clouded by
her dazed state.
When Lee-yeon saw him staring at her with dark and greedy eyes, she could feel
herself get more wet. He looked at her like she was an altar, and he was intent on
worshiping her.
“What are you staring at?” he asked again. She could hear it now that he was teasing
her. “Are you staring at my dick?”
“What?” Lee-yeon asked, startled. She was all the more embarrassed by her actions
when Kwon Chae-woo noticed the way her body was reacting to everything they did.
He simply laughed, like he read her mind. “You know,” he said. “I would be happy
living in a basement, I would need sun or water or anything, as long as I can have you.
If I have you, everything else doesn’t matter. I’m the easiest thing to take care of.” He
licked his finger and pressed it against her clit to rub it. “But I’ll die if the water from
down here dries.”
Lee-yeon groaned at his words, her insides growing tighter around him.
“So good, Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo moaned. “So good.”
He continued to snap his hips against her. There was so much pleasure in the
movement that Lee-yeon felt like she was losing her mind. She tried to stay conscious,
but she could feel herself starting to slip. She didn’t even know how much time had
passed already. She looked out the window to try and see if she could tell, but it was
no use.
She moaned again, except this time it wasn’t a moan of pleasure. She felt like she was
going to die of fatigue.
“Get a job.”
Kwon Chae-woo looked at her with hard eyes.
“It’s okay,” Lee-yeon told him. “You can leave the house.”
“Why do you sound so tired all of a sudden?” he asked.
Lee-yeon looked down at her heat and groaned. She felt like she was actually going to
die.
“Even though the mountain was dangerous, you still did so well,” she told him with
her last bits of strength. “I think I was just worried about you.” Her breasts pushed
against his chest as she started breathing harder. She flinched when she felt his dick
become harder inside her, but she didn’t have the strength to say a thing.
Seemingly losing his patience, Kwon Chae-woo started pounding into her harder. His
moans were loud, and his movements were strong.
Lee-yeon felt herself consumed by a burning white heat as an orgasm washed over her
again. She clenched around Kwon Chae-woo who glared at her as he reached his
climax at the sudden pressure. He pulled out and came on a towel.
Roughly, Kwon Chae-woo pushed his finger into her and swirled it around as if he
were taking his cum out of her. Their bodies had only been separated for a moment
when he grabbed her ankles again.
Lee-yeon felt like passing out. “Get a job,” she said again, but faintly this time.

It was dawn and the air around her was cold. Lee-yeon woke up with a frown as she
felt that her mouth was dry. She felt thirsty so she tried to look around for some
water.
Light came through the thin curtains of the hospital room. She felt nauseous just
looking at the light.
“Are you up?” she heard Kwon Chae-woo ask behind her.
When she heard the quiet voice, she felt emotions surge through her body. She felt
the sadness that came with running through the light of dawn and the relief that came
with planting her roots around someone.
“Don’t be scared,” she could almost hear. She felt like crying as she remembered
Choo-ja’s voice.
When she turned around to see Kwon Chae-woo, a tongue pushed into her mouth. Her
dry lips were wet once more. She tried to push herself away from him, but he just
grabbed her so that she could feel his hard dick against her.
She froze at the feeling, but Kwon Chae-woo calmed her down. “It’s okay,” he
whispered. Then, he surprised her by shoving his cock back inside her. She cried out
in shock.
“How are you so pretty?” Kwon Chae-woo asked as he thrust into her.
“Stop!” Lee-yeon cried out. “Stop!”
But he was relentless and he pounded into her tirelessly. He moved fervently and
quickly, moving against her like a dog. The sound of skin slapping echoed through the
dawn.
“Lee-yeon,” he moaned. His pace slowed but he went deeper. “It’s so good, Lee-yeon.”
As he hit her spot, Lee-yeon had no choice but to moan. She felt him grab her breasts
from the back and start playing with her nipples. His hips kept moving as he toyed
with her and sucked on her earlobes.
This wasn’t the first time they had done it, but Kwon Chae-woo was being more
aggressive than he usually was.
Lee-yeon was about to scream when he stuffed his fingers into her mouth. Hazily, she
started to suck on them and his movements only became rougher.
When she bit on his fingers, he laughed. “Good morning, Lee-yeon.”

“I was worried sick about you all night!” Choo-ja exclaimed through the phone. Her
voice was so loud that Lee-yeon had to keep her phone away from her ear to protect it
from the shouting. She could hear Choo-ja sniffling on the other end of the line, but
she didn’t mention it, and, eventually, the shouting paused when Choo-ja stopped to
blow her nose.
“Then Chae-woo called me last night while you were sleeping to tell me that you only
had a few minor injuries,” Choo-ja said in a quieter voice. “He was so calm when he
told me not to worry.”
“Ah,” Lee-yeon said into the phone, nodding. It had only been a few minutes since she
woke up and, while it had surprised her when she found that it was already noon, that
wasn’t what bothered her.
What bothered her was the fact that, when she had woken up alone, she checked her
phone to find that she had slept through ten missed calls. She wondered how much
longer she could’ve been asleep if Kwon Chae-woo hadn’t entered the room just then
so that she could answer Choo-ja’s call.
“I’ll be right there,” she told Choo-ja. Her eyes drifted to the shopping bags that Kwon
Chae-woo carried. “It’s the memorial day.”
“Don’t worry about it!” Choo-ja told her. “Take it easy. It could’ve been your memorial
day, you know.”
Lee-yeon shook her head. “No, I’ll be there,” she said. “You shouldn’t be alone.”
They said their goodbyes and Lee-yeon ended the call quickly. Her legs ached when
she tried to move, but, other than that, it wasn’t too bad.
“Where did you go?” she asked Kwon Chae-woo.
He looked down at her hospital gown. He was just looking but his gaze had such a
tight grasp on Lee-yeon that she could almost feel it. “Well, you can’t go out like that,”
he said simply. He reached into the bag and handed her a set of undergarments.
Lee-yeon took the intimate pieces quickly and meekly hid them behind her back. “How
did you pay?”
Kwon Chae-woo scoffed at her and frowned. “The shops below the hospital have
everything,” he told her. “I just billed them to our room.”
“But,” Lee-yeon paused as she furrowed her brows, “you’re a patient, you know. Why
did you wake me up? I could’ve handled all that.”
Then, Kwon Chae-woo pulled her close and wrapped his arms around her waist. “You
can’t just go all innocent on me out of nowhere.”
The moment his breath brushed against her neck, Lee-yeon could feel the spot
between her legs start to grow hot. It flustered her that her whole body seemed to
react to everything about Kwon Chae-woo from his scent to his breath to his voice to
his grasp. She couldn’t help how she felt around him.
“Your nipples get hard so easily, I can see them through your gown,” he chuckled as
he looked at her. “If I let you go out like that, any bastard from the street could have
seen the nipples I sucked on all night. I wouldn’t be able to live with that.”
Lee-yeon could feel her face heat up, so she pushed it against his chest to hide it.
“There’s no way I’m letting you go out without underwear,” he told her. “Maybe if I
get shot in the head but, otherwise, what kind of husband would I be if I allowed such
a thing?” He started to caress Lee-yeon’s waist.
“You should lie down a little longer, Chae-woo,” Lee-yeon said nervously.
“Only if you lie down with me.”
Lee-yeon had tried to change the subject, but it was no use. The more he touched her,
the more she seemed to get disturbed.
“I’ll go home and come back in the evening,” she said weakly.
“I don’t want that.” Kwon Chae-woo squeezed her waist.
Hesitantly, Lee-yeon tapped his back so that he would move away from her. “You’re
not made of steel, Chae-woo,” she said. “You’re a human being. At this rate, you’re
going to be really weak when you get old. I know this might seem boring, but please
focus on your health.”
When Kwon Chae-woo didn’t speak, Lee-yeon added, “Besides, we already did it last
night.”
Kwon Chae-woo smirked and pressed a kiss to her neck. “What was that?”
“You kept doing it while I was still swollen,” she mumbled.
“Are you talking about my shoulder or your hole—”
“Both!”
Lee-yeon hit him on the back as if she was scolding him. Kwon Chae-woo couldn’t hold
back his laughter.
He realized that he liked everything about her. He liked the way that she cared about
people, even when they didn’t seem like they were coming back. He liked her
innocence, and he didn’t want to let her go. He didn’t care about any memories he
might’ve lost because he was certain that he had gained something much more
valuable.
“I think only stupid people would take their d!ck out when someone is swollen,” he
teased her.
She glared at him playfully. “Chae-woo, there’s such a thing called manners, you
know.”
“I’d rather do it every day with you than have any manners at all.”
Lee-yeon blinked at his words. She looked like she was about to say something, but
she had forgotten.
“Do you not like it?” Kwon Chae-woo asked.
Lee-yeon shook her head. “It’s not that,” she said. “It’s just that… it hurts after.”
Kwon Chae-woo frowned. “I didn’t want to compare but…” he trailed off. “Am I not
good anymore?”
Lee-yeon couldn’t find the right words to tell him how she felt.
“I don’t know much,” Kwon Chae-woo admitted. “I just go at it like a dog without any
skill, I know. If you want, I’ll learn first. We won’t do it as much… Would that be
better?” He closed his eyes guiltily.
“That’s not it!” Lee-yeon burst out, her face turning red. “It’s not that at all! It’s not
your fault or anything.”
“Then what is it?”
Lee-yeon looked away as if she was embarrassed. “You’re just… too big for me. I just
hoped you’d go a little easier on me, that’s all.”
“I knew it,” Kwon Chae-woo said. He looked at Lee-yeon seriously. “Don’t go out
without me.”

In the end, they used the hospital’s VIP room like a motel room and went home soon
after.
It was Choo-ja’s third husband’s Memorial Day. He was Lee-yeon’s distant relative, an
uncle in some way. Out of all her husbands that had passed away, he was the one that
Choo-ja had cared most.
When Lee-yon and Kwon Chae-woo got home, all they could smell was the delicious
food in the house.
As they entered, a bunch of pebbles were lined by the door. Lee-yeon saw some with
cute little animals on them and picked them up and placed them in her pocket. To
others, the pebbles would have looked like nothing out of the ordinary, but Lee-yeon
knew that it was all Gyu-baek’s work.
This was his way of expressing his emotions. Even as a small child, he was already
working hard to show how he felt.
Lee-yeon glared at the man following behind her. “You need more rest,” she said.
“You’ll get hurt if you don’t rest.” She glanced at Kwon Chae-woo’s forehead and bit
her lips. It might not have seemed too bad, but Lee-yeon had experienced a wound
similar to the one on Kwon Chae-woo’s head before and she knew how bad it could be.
She was wearing her fear like a bullet-proof vest. The man that had tried to kill her
might come back and she wouldn’t be able to do anything. She felt like their time
together was limited and it scared her.
“You just came from an accident too, Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo told her. “I felt the
same as you are.”
“That’s different.”
“Different from you?”
Lee-yeon shook her head. “You woke different. You hated me right away.” she said.
“The moment you saw me, you rejected me.”
“I was trying to survive,” Kwon Chae-woo frowned. “At any given moment, I will save
you instinctively. Don’t make me feel bad about a moment when I wasn’t myself.”
But Lee-yeon didn’t budge.
Kwon Chae-woo’s shoulders slumped. “It’s because I’m not good at sex, isn’t it—”
“Just get in the house and lie down!” Lee-yeon stormed into the house and away from
her husband.
She felt like everything that had happened yesterday was a dream. She couldn’t seem
to understand when the news flashed images of the landslide, the jeeps that were
carrying soldiers in the rescue team and the people they were saving. All day, Leeyeon had managed to remain calm because—
“Lee-yeon, wait up!”
Because her life was as normal as it had been before.
When they walked in, the service table for the Memorial Day was ready. Choo-ja
hadn’t prepared it the traditional way, opting to do something more from memory.
There was the coffee that Lee-yeon’s uncle had liked, the kimchi jeon that Choo-ja
burnt, some undercooked rice, and an old poetry book.
“Choo-ja, I’m here,” Lee-yeon said, finally catching sight of the woman. She noticed a
look on Choo-ja’s face that she had seen every year, it was the odd look of a woman
who was getting by with the short memory of the man that she had once held. But, for
the first time, Lee-yeon recognized the look as her own future.

“Hey!” Choo-ja greeted. She looked a little lonely at the table, but she was smiling
brightly when she stood up to go to Lee-yeon. She was holding a little fruit knife that
she must have been using to cut something. “You wench! I was worried sick about
you!”
“Ah, Choo-ja!” Lee-yeon laughed. She could feel her sadness drifting away.
Choo-ja started to talk in a rather animated fashion. “I saw on TV that there were no
deaths, but the hospital director wouldn’t pick up the phone!” she exclaimed. “I know
that sometimes people die ahead of others, but I was so angry thinking that you had
gone before me!”
Lee-yeon shook her head. “I’m sorry, Choo-ja. I can explain.”
“Don’t make me laugh!” said the woman. “You weren’t thinking about me at all!”
“I really wasn’t in the right frame of mind!”
Choo-ja looked like she was about to cry, but, luckily, Kwon Chae-woo managed to
stop the conversation from taking a turn.
“I think it was good that I went instead of you, mother-in-law,” he said. He carefully
stepped behind Choo-ja and took her fruit knife and put it away.
“My son-in-law,” Choo-ja said, looking at the man with warm eyes. Her face had
completely shifted from one of terror to the face of a woman looking at a knight that
she trusted with her life. “Have you eaten? Here you are saving Lee-yeon and all we
have to feed you is Memorial Day food.”
Kwon Chae-woo shook his head. “It’s okay.”
When he turned to look at Lee-yeon, she looked away. Her heart was racing. He might
have seemed like the perfect son-in-law right now, but she knew that everyone would
be shocked if they found out all the things that he had done to her.
“I’ll help you clean up, Choo-ja,” she said, scratching her neck and scurrying to the
kitchen. She opened the window to let out the oily air and went to the sink to wash the
frying pan that was left soaking.
“Lee-yeon.”
Her breath became ragged when she heard his voice against her ear.
“Was your uncle important to you?”
Lee-yeon put the sponge down and stared at the water in the sink. “If it wasn’t for
him, I really wouldn’t have had anywhere to go. Even though he got married late, he
gladly accepted me. Choo-ja was always friendly too.”
She felt him hug her waist wordlessly. She could feel his warmth spread against her
back.
“I healed by living with them,” Lee-yeon said.
Kwon Chae-woo held her tight and rested his chin on top of her head. Lee-yeon
stumbled at the sudden weight but was quickly held up against his strong embrace.
“Then I need to be good around him,” Kwon Chae-woo said.
“Even though he’s gone?”
“That doesn’t matter,” he said. “I’m your husband so I need to learn.”
Lee-yeon frowned. “Learn what?” When he didn’t reply, she picked up the sponge and
continued washing the dishes.
“Death note,” Kwon Chae-woo finally said.
The frying pan slipped from Lee-yeon’s grip. The gears in her mind were turning. Did
he really mean to say death note? The notebook where you write the people you want
killed?

“I think he is someone I should be thanking,” he continued. “I’d like to meet him and
thank him in person.” His voice seemed tired from where he was standing behind her.
Lee-yeon was stunned. “Chae-woo, I’m really not that great of a person.”
“What do you mean?” His voice was sharp.
“I mean, you don’t have to go overboard,” she said carefully.
“I don’t think this is going overboard.”
When Lee-yeon didn’t respond, Kwon Chae-woo became still. “You think I’m
overreacting, Lee-yeon?”
Yes. Even in the past, you went overboard. Lee-yeon thought to herself. But she just
shook her head. She recognized what he meant with his actions, that he was trying to
show how he felt about her. She also felt like it was her fault for making him think that
way.
“I’m worried about you,” she said. Kwon Chae-woo was quiet, so she continued. “My
parents both died in an accident. I don’t know if it truly was an accident, though.”
He didn’t speak. He wanted to look at her in the eyes, but he felt like, if he moved, she
would stop talking. He was being so careful with her that he even loosened his grip.
Lee-yeon continued. “I have no reason to think that, of course,” she said. “But I’ve
always thought it was strange. I always thought there was something wrong with their
deaths.” She turned around suddenly and looked straight into Kwon Chae-woo’s eyes.
“If you get hurt, then I will have nothing good left. So please be careful.”
“Lee-yeon,” Kwon Chae-woo murmured as he hugged Lee-yeon. He put his chin on her
shoulder and nodded. “Okay, I’ll listen to you,” he said. “But just because your parents
died at the same time, it doesn’t mean we have to.”
“For us, that’s not the answer,” he said. “Just because you were hurt, that doesn’t
mean you have to hurt all the time.”
Lee-yeon felt her eyes sting and she looked down.
She remembered the words she had told him when she asked him not to sacrifice
himself for her.
“No matter what happens, I don’t care what you want, you will never leave me like
that again.”
As she started to cry, Kwon Chae-woo tried to hold back his laughter. He had to be her
light, he had to take care of her and guide her. He couldn’t let the ghosts of her
parents haunt her forever. He was the only one that would be able to keep her safe
and lead her away from the darkness that had filled her whole life.
“You’re truly amazing,” he whispered into her ears as he pulled her close to him once
more.
In my eyes, he thought, So Lee-yeon will always be the prettiest and the greatest
thing. So Lee-yeon who saves trees and takes care of me will always be the sexiest and
most amazing thing in my life.
It felt pathetic, but Lee-yeon couldn’t help but tear up more at Kwon Chae-woo’s
words. She melted further into his embrace and laughter filled the room.
When they went back to spend time with Choo-ja, the woman was watching Lee-yeon
with intent eyes.
“Your under eyes are dark, but you look good,” she said.
Lee-yeon tilted her head. “Pardon?”
When she brushed one side of Lee-yeon’s face, Choo-ja’s eyes lit up. “You’re a
woman!” she exclaimed.
Lee-yeon turned away as the older woman gave her a mischievous look. She smiled at
Lee-yeon slyly as the girl blushed and pouted her lips, looking away. She reached out
and caressed Lee-yeon’s hands before calming her expression.
“Is it good?” she asked suddenly.
“Choo-ja!”
“In the morning, you go and fix trees, but at night—”
“Stop!” Lee-yeon was embarrassed as she tried to look away from the old woman.
Their eyes met for a moment and then they both looked away. Choo-ja held back her
laughter and Lee-yeon tried to calm down.
“I still miss him, you know,” Choo-ja said as she looked down at the coffee mug on the
table. “He wanted to stay home, but I dragged him to the hospital. I was greedy and I
wanted more time with him, so he couldn’t go home even if he wanted to. Making him
stay longer than he should have is my biggest regret.”
Lee-yeon’s uncle had always read poetry to Choo-ja, even when he was at the later
stages of liver cancer. He used poems to confess his love but, when he was near
death, he could no longer say anything.
“I wonder if that person is well,” Choo-ja said.
Lee-yeon frowned. “Who?”
“The person who paid your uncle’s hospital bill.”
Lee-yeon’s eyes lit up. She remembered the classical CD that she kept at the bottom
of her drawer.
“I really don’t know what I would’ve done without that person’s help,” Choo-ja said. “I
wonder if he ever met his son.”

*
Continue in part 3!!
